The first project in the Zakka Style sewalong is a "Zig Zag tote". I did mine a little differently - I wanted log cabins on mine, so I did log cabins in front, and a modified zigzag (one seam 3D flying geese) in the back ;) The bag measures 12.5" wide x 14" tall x 2.5" deep, and is lined with a turquoisey-aquay blue. It came out beautifully!
for a week full of projects featuring:
For the effect of the Buddhist Insight meditation on the prefrontal cortex, see: S. W. Lazar, C. A. Kerr, R. H. Wasserman, J. R. Craig, D. N. Greve, M. T. Treadway, M. McGarvey, B. T. Quinn, J. A. Dusek, H. Benson, S. L. Rauch, C. I. Moore, and B. Fischi, ‘Meditation Experience is Associated with Increased Cortical Thickness’, Neuroreport, 2005, 16(17), 1893-1897. Link to article.
We had a BBQ with Nancy, Cassie, Dale and Grandpa John.
As the saying goes, “NO ONE FOLLOWS EGGS!”
-Heat 4 tbsp of sugar in a pan on medium heat without adding any water or liquid.
Cheap (Check!)
Painted, sanded and pulled down old wallpaper with our bare hands. The worst was actually putting masking tape under their new desks. You have no idea. So yeah, the writing bump wasn't the worst thing to happen to my fingers that day, getting wallpaper up under my nails was!
and worth saving from the rag pile.
Meanwhile, the trade route to peace is moving along. Last week, the Confederation of Indian Industry (CII) and the Pakistan Business Council (PBC) signed a Memorandum of Understanding (MoU) with Aman ki Asha agreeing to host annual conferences alternately in India and Pakistan. The second Aman ki Asha Indo-Pak Economic Conference, and the first under this partnership, is scheduled to take place on May 7-8, 2012, in Lahore.
My dreams
The information provided in this article is for educational purposes only. The information is not offered as consulting, legal or advice of any type and should not be relied on as such. No representations or warranties express or implied, with respect to any information in tis article are created.
They determine economic policy, despite the catastrophic failures their policies have produced and continue to produce.
THAT is the task at hand. Maintaining excellence where we currently earn medals, while improving in events where we know we have the ability to be competitive. To that end we need a plan, a road map if you will, of how we are going to get there. Putting that road map together is the role of USATF. I would hope any such plan might include putting our most promising athletes together with our best coaches by area of expertise. At least I think that would be the place to start. Luckily we have another year before the next championship (Daegu, 2011) and two years until the next Olympics (London, 2012). So there is plenty of time to put something workable in place.
- Red
If you are pregnant and not sure what to do please know that there are people and places that want to walk with you through your thoughts and choices. If you are not in this situation chances are you know someone who is or you may be able to share some time loving those women who need it. Jesus loves life and has given each of us a new life in him. Share that love with those around you.
*If Boy Scouts is too expensive for you, try a Christian program, Keepers of the Faith. For the price of just the book, you can start a club at your church. They have a boys' club called Contenders of the Faith and a girls' club called Keepers at Home. Both clubs have books with units and projects in them, much the same as the Boy Scouts do, only with a Christian undertone (or really, an overtone), and with respect to the differing roles of men and women.
It's very similar to the coffee table book that you can create from all these other photo websites, but what's cool about the Blurb Book is that it can "slurp" all of your photos from most major photo storing sites such as Picassa or Flickr, and it can also "slurp" your entire blog if it's hosted on Blogger, Live Journal, Typepad or WordPress. You can also share the book with family and friends by linking it to social networking sites like Facebook and Digg.
"What is writing a letter to the agong, compared to deceiving the agong and the Conference of Rulers at the same time?" he asked.
The Lake In July
Shifting sands
Besides the delicious recipes, perhaps one of the coolest features of the book is the Cooking Times List that lists every recipe according to how long it takes in the slow-cooker. You can flip back there and choose a recipe based on how much time you have. How cool is that? Got 3 hours? Make the Cheese-y Mac. How about 10 hours? Spiced Sweet Potato Satay is the way to go.
200g biscuits (cookies) such as Graham crackers, Digestives or Hobnobs
And calligraphy doesn't have to be limited to just the outer envelope. You can have your calligrapher write out names for place cards, seating cards, menu cards, table numbers, favor tags and any other stationery element in your wedding.
My admiration for William Shakespeare has grown exponentially through this experience. Writing this script has been the single-most difficult piece of writing that I’ve attempted to date. When you hear those really quotable lines in a movie or TV series, appreciate it to its fullest
Harvey is Ilocano from Cagayan. He is an Overseas Filipino Worker since 10 years ago. Ronald, on the other hand, is a Chamorro, a native of the Marianas island. They have the same name structure and share a common religion because of the shared history of the Marianas and the Philippines. Both were colonies of Spain and the USA.
At another point, Bill Wilson added: “I sort of always felt that something was lost from A.A. when we stopped emphasizing the morning meditation.” (See DR. BOB, supra, p. 178).
But from what I had told my G.P., he referred to him as an "odd personality' which was made worse by the kids coming along. I'm beginning to feel my G.P. was right. Unfortunately he had to go on steroids shortly after the second child was born. So I will never really know what happened or what was to blame - maybe a combination of things. But what does that say for me being attracted to an "odd personality"? I try to think it was because my husband was so clever that he was able to fool me. God I hope that it doesn't make me odd for having fallen for it. No - my husband was a very clever person. He knew how to manipulate & pull the wool over anybody's eyes.
Did I mention there is a Malcolm Hardee Week at this year’s Edinburgh Fringe?
I was a little nervous about purchasing shiny, gold shorts, myself. I have to say, though, these are one of my FAVORITE purchases...the gold isn't too shiny and the length is appropriate.
Here's what's happened in our lives since August. I (Karmen) moved back to Houston, Texas and Mandy is back in Columbia after a summer in Myrtle Beach. I'm now moving into a new apartment in downtown Houston and I finally have a job that pays me enough to support my shoe addiction. I desperately need an outlet for my creativity so I'm basically going to try and do this again.
We just need to think of it.
and turned the key in the ignition,
“Oh no, Dr Eno!”
Ponting elected to take the strike first after winning the toss, put on 166 for the second wicket with Simon Katich. Left handed Katich scored 66. Ponting added 60 for the third wicket with Michael Hussey (46 not out) before he was trapped lbw by Harbhajan Singh. It was the ninth time the Australian Captain has fallen to the off-spinner.
Tribute - (Cornish Ale)
If you are good at comedy, take classes from the Groundlings or I.O. (formerly known as Improv Olympic).Second City in Chicago is also great.These are the most recognized improv comedy places. They look good on a resume.It’s a great place to meet people when you are new to town.Classes are expensive so that can be hard when you are just starting out.I didn’t do this but I wish I had.Almost every actor on The Office has studied with one of these 3 places.
We hope during the coming year to visit some of the wonderful cruising friends that we met along our journey. We often talk about our experiences during the seven years that we were on sv Linda and the one thing that was constant was the cruising community and how special it was. Without exception cruisers were always ready to assist in any way necessary to help someone in need. They unselfishly shared spare parts, knowledge, and moral support.
Do you have a good asparagus recipe to share? I’d love to see it.
Over time subjects are revised, terminology changes, and it is easy to become confused if things don’t seem to be the same as they were when you were at school. Sometimes parents can feel inadequate when trying to help their children with their school work, but this App will help parents to feel more confident. As a former teacher myself, I appreciate having the reference material in such a convenient tool. Older students might also find the App handy as a reference tool. It is a must have for every parent, teacher or student iPad.
Patterned Paper - My Minds Eye
I have included the more appealing artwork for 'Flower Child' as an alternative cover.
We look over to see what the boys think of the “fighting” going on.
When lingerie designer, Karol Martins, sent us the lookbook of her new collection with a Ballet theme, it was love at first sight. Not only because we love Ballet, but her handmade lingerie and details are so darling and the styles of this range are so beautiful we wanted to share it with you.
(Need)
Cerra’s editor said that she was “biased about the issue” and that they couldn’t run the story, as “it would affect LILCO’s stock.” On insisting that it was an important story and should be printed anyway, Cerra was again reassigned.
Hint: If you're Pro-SOPA, mentioning NBC and Viacom isn't going to help you persuade me.
In John 14, Jesus is talking with the disciples, essentially getting them ready for His departure. They were not too thrilled and needed some reassurance. Jesus explains to them that they will be together again. He describes for them the place He is going and how they are to get there. (through Him) It is in that context that Jesus describes the work to be done through them.
I’m starting my official blog to document my live, family, and passion for photography. I’ve been on a little break since getting married a little over 6 months ago so there’s been a lot of adjustment. Any newly married couple can relate, but fortunately I have a very supportive wife, family, and most of all God to help me along this journey.
Keeping a positive self-esteem may be a key to so what health and wellness.
I use a tapestry needle and a few strands of thread to turn my tube through, but everyone has their own method. There are a few tips in this previous post.
It’s little things like that really. I know that a year from now I’ll be settled and have everything I could have ever dreamed of. There are good investment opportunities on the horizon, and lots of money to be made.
All Strapped Up – The Vinyl Stitches
My five minutes for today.
For years Mick has been taking full advantage of the life available to a pro athlete: fame, fortune, and a different girl in every city. But when he meets and beds confident, beautiful event planner Tara Lincoln, he wants much more than the typical one-night stand. Too bad Tara’s not interested in getting to know football’s most notorious playboy any better.
Well, needless to say, we did get to the tire place in a taxi and one of my friends did rescue me from having to spend 100 dollars on a taxi to Downtown Disney. My friends and I were finally able to put the new tire on my car and we were finally able to get back home with the car. Although, it was a horrible experience at the moment, it makes quite a comical story. Especially, if I emphasize the part where I was looking like a hobo carrying a tire down the streets of Orlando.
I hope everyone is able to observe one (or more!) of these occasions today in whatever way they feel is most appropriate, beneficial, and beautiful!
I did, however, have some disagreements with the way the author managed to end the book. Thirty pages left and she managed to throw some unnecessary stuff in that bungled the complete happiness I would've felt otherwise.
WordPress has some limitations and minor bugs, but I can’t stay the major Blogger bugs and problems.
The theocratic state Brennert has constructed here puts me in mind of The Handmaid’s Tale; while there aren’t breeding programs, homosexuals and women seeking reproductive rights are persecuted by the state. Bruce (man, that’s weird to say!) discovers that his parents were involved with what the graphic novel calls counter-reproductive activities—helping homosexuals maimed by the state in attempts to “cure” them, sex workers, and women who turn to desperate measures to abort. In a short news report by Victoria Vale, we learn that the Protectorate is busy conquering and converting the Southern Hemisphere and landholding men have plural votes (while woman have none). While it can sometimes be a bit too pat—really? They celebrate the day Cromwell recovered from malaria and not his birthday?—it’s very deft worldbuilding. While some might question how the Puritan Protectorate got so visually Catholic, I can see the evolution, especially after three hundred years. Brennert wisely resists any urge to give us more than we need to frame this story of a religious Bruce fighting against a theocratic state.
All photos used are directly from Erin's blog, and used with permission.
an economic lightweight
As you read the rest of this article, you will be absolutely amazed at some of the crazy things that school children in America are being arrested for.
Risk plays fast screamo/emo fury infused hardcore that reminds me of bands like Yaphet Kotto, Shotmaker, and even a bit of Kaospilot. A style of music that admittedly I listen to less and less these days but when done right I still absolutely love. You know classics never die and when I hear current bands of this ilk cherry pick the Ebullition archives so to speak I can't help but get excited. This four song demo cd-r comes packaged in a re-purposed brown paper bag with graphics glued on. Totally DIY packaging that really takes me back. I can't help but think of late night Kinko's hang outs with my friends making zines and demo packaging. Great stuff.
“Hold on!!!!” Obadiah jumped up as if cattle prod had been stuck up his backside.”Hang on just a minute there!” he said to the insect filled air around him. “How did I learn about Mr Marshall Marshall?! Nobody ever spoke to me!” Obadiah paused, uncertain, trying to recall if maybe Mrs Maple had told him about Mr Marshall Marshall but he was pretty sure she had never spoken to him. He tried to think if he’d ever seen anyone else in town, but the mists still filled the space in his mind where memories should have been. He waited for the voice inside his head to offer further direction but all was quiet in there.
Psalm 65:2: (The Message) We all arrive at your doorstep sooner or later, loaded with guilt, Our sins too much for us— but you get rid of them once and for all. Blessed are the chosen! Blessed the guest at home in your place! We expect our fill of good things in your house, your heavenly manse. All your salvation wonders are on display in your trophy room. Earth-Tamer, Ocean-Pourer, Mountain-Maker, Hill-Dresser, Muzzler of sea storm and wave crash, of mobs in noisy riot— Far and wide they’ll come to a stop, they’ll stare in awe, in wonder. Dawn and dusk take turns calling, “Come and worship.”
purple thread through a needle.
"The good stuff," I reply, "is what I've been unsuccessfully attempting to write for the past month, which is why this blog hasn't been updated." See, I have just as much trouble with The First Five Pages as everyone else. It's easy to recognize the things that don't work, and to pinpoint the reason that they don't; it's much harder to identify a formula for amazing writing. So, though I can tell you what you probably shouldn't do, I can't offer a definitive example of what you should do.
Trusted: Andrew Feldman is the first Tory chairman to be given office space in 10 Downing Street
Those were the days.
There I go, screaming again. Maybe it's the 'consequences'.
I was watching a video interview with him about The Long Count which was interesting – he said that for him, it also extended to ideas of games and combat, conflict and play in every day life. Was that of significance to you too?
Partner and Cross-Promote on Social Media is the 59th in a series of excerpts from our book, Be a Person: the Social Operating Manual for Enterprises (itself part of a series for different audiences). We’re just past page 190. At this rate it’ll be a long time before we get through all 430 pages, but luckily, if you’re impatient, the book is available in paper form at bit.ly/OrderBeAPerson and you can save $5 using Coupon Code 62YTRFCV
The Abenaki are robust, strong and well composed, large and stylish. They use the colours red, blue, and black for face and body paint. The "matchias" (porcupine quills) and "wampum" (cut and polished seashells) are used as adornments. The tribes west of the Kennebec wear bracelets or belts of copper. Both men and women wear their hair long and tied behind the head. The men traditionally wore a loin cloth made of an animal skin, which covered their lower body and was held up on both sides by a belt. Another animal skin which was tied over one shoulder wrapped the upper body. In order to face the harsh winters, they added extra thick sleeves, leggings for the "mekezin" (moccasin) and more than likely an extra skin covering the shoulders. Their winter clothing was made from the skins of moose or beaver originally, however from the beginning of the 17th century they adopted European fabrics.
5. What does my nonverbal language say to others?
The profile of beer overall would benefit from Molson Coors and the other international brewers becoming strong competitors in the cask and premium bottled markets. Molson Coors have already taken the most positive attitude towards cask beer of all the “Big Four”, investing in a dedicated cask brewing plant at Burton-on-Trent, launching Worthington White Shield and the paler, lower-strength Red Shield on cask and announcing a wide range of guest ales.
This concept is not an easy one to grasp. If God is full and complete, why does he need to expand himself to exchange love? The next question we can ask is why does God need to do anything? God has a personality which indicates that he has preferences. Perhaps this need to expand for the purpose of exchanging love speaks of the importance love plays in the lives of all individuals.
Sometimes i think that prolifers - Christians - are misunderstood before they've had a chance to say one word. There are so many judgements and assumptions about our position that make a fair dialogue a rare thing.
Wednesday – Leftover bean soup, cornbread, salad
But when they are left to their own devices, their true colors shine through and it's clear that they would rather excavate the dirt pile and play bamboo sword fight than make fairy houses or bake pretend cupcakes.
White gold is an alloy of gold and some white metals such as silver and palladium. White gold can be 18kt, 14kt, 9kt or any karat. For example, 18kt yellow gold is made by mixing 75% gold (750 parts per thousand) with 25% (250 parts per thousand) other metals such as copper and zinc. 18kt white gold is made by mixing 75% gold with 25% other metals such as silver and palladium. So the amount of gold is the same but the alloy is different.
Most of both counties were without power or heat for most of that weekend, and many remain in the dark and cold. The hardships have been profound.
The Hobbit is being filmed at a higher frame rate of 48 fps (frames per second), compared to the standard 24, and this has caused quite a stir. We’ve been promised a smoother, more lifelike cinematic vision, perhaps an image better compared to HD movie.The latest footage may have demonstrated the Oscar-winning director’s ambitious vision, but we may have to wait until the finished product is released before the sceptics can be won over.
1. The borders with the United States will be closed due to a significant political and military event; no Mexican citizen in the USA will be allowed to cross back to their country, and only U.S. citizens with valid passports who are in Mexico will be allowed to return; those with foreign visas, Green Cards, border crossing cards, SENTRI will not be allowed into the U.S.A. Those with diplomatic status can enter, except for diplomats from China, Pakistan, Iran, and Venezuela. All vehicle lanes will be closed, those allowed o cross must do so by foot. No planes or boats from Mexico will be allowed into the airspace or harbors; any planes trying will be shot down; any boats trying will be seized by the Coast Gard.
The knights come riding two and two.
Peggy, Obama Cannot Afford Traditions of a White Presidency When It Comes to Re-Election! Does Jesus' Death Set Us free from the bondage of Sin? “Proof of the Healing Power of Prayer Friday, April 6, 2012 12:28 PM Read more: Proof of the Healing Power of Prayer” WATCH: STEVEN MOFFAT ON FILMING ‘DOCTOR WHO’ IN NEW YORK CNN: NO GRAND JURY FOR TRAYVON MARTIN
- You may receive a 2nd entry by linking on twitter and leaving an additional comment with the link.
Mongolia is a truly stunning country, with some of the most awful roads ever created by people. Unsurprisingly we got lost more than once, including a four-hour jaunt up a mountain through a field of rocks to a sand trap, where we got stuck and eventually had to turn around. Needless to say tempers were a little frayed, but we got through it (with some help from The Gobi Express, a team of two lovely Danes).
God has raised from death Our Lord Jesus Christ, who is the Greatest Shepherd of the sheep as the result of His blood, by which the eternal covenant is sealed. May the God of peace provide me with every good thing I need in order to do His will, and may He through Our Lord Jesus Christ; do in me what pleases Him. And to Christ be the glory forever and ever! Amen!
Trial by media just like the Madeleine McCann case in Portugal where the parents were accused of killing their daughter and covering it up which seriously hampered the continued search for Madeleine.
Oh- and I wanted to let you know - I've been invited by PouchMart to do some postings of my bag creations on their new blog. Pouchmart is a web store that sells all kinds of bags - that I use often for my crafts - and my first posting came up over the weekend.
“However just as Tunku has the right to openly voice his dissent, the party’s right to state its position on such a fundamental policy position as Bersih must also be respected.”
Treasury Board President Tony Clement drops into the Thornloe Cheese Factory near New Liskeard, Ont., to hand out $1.2-million to a smattering of local small businesses.
To enhance the scene, they were flying against the backdrop of a waxing crescent moon, lit by the sun still sinking in the west. Off the moon's shoulder sat Venus, like a lantern suspended by thick twilight. The sound and the scene kept me standing there for several minutes. It was a really beautiful sight. I thought about my favorite seagull of all, Jonathan Livingston. He taught me valuable lessons way back in the '70's, lessons that have stayed with me and continue to serve me well.
Resistencia, Argentina
I want him to know.
* The night we floated in like zombies, in shock after the sudden death of a close friend (who had spent many a night there with us). Steph and Mike took one look at us and said, “You need to eat.” Mike assembled a platter of apps which tasted better than anything I have ever eaten…to my mind, because feeding somebody in a time of need is Mike D’s sincerest expression of love.
B3. Dirt For 485 (3:24)
I've often felt that too many supposedly "correct" performances are based simply on an orchestra turning off its vibrato and stringing up with gut. Bingo: two strokes and you're HIP. On the other hand, hearing the OAE with Sir Simon Rattle doing Fidelio at Glyndebourne was simply magnificent. Besides, HIP orchestral musicians are often far better informed about the music they play, more passionately committed to their task in hand and generally more intelligent, upbeat and contributive than certain other strata of the profession who sometimes veer towards "Theirs not to make reply, Theirs not to reason why, Theirs but to do and die..." (Tennyson).
into armor plating) streak from the Beerdestroyer, causing the
...people frequently cite “4,000” as the number of eventual excess cancer fatalities. However, by limiting its analysis to people with the greatest exposure to released radiation, the report seriously underestimates the number of cancers and cancer deaths attributable to Chernobyl. The effects of the radiation were not limited to the “contaminated” areas but would be felt in Europe and beyond.
international transportation of
Rock my world into the sunlight
I can't do it.
Dear Purchase manager,(Beats starting with "Dear Dope", I guess...)
The lovely people from George at Asda has invited selected bloggers, including myself, to pick from a selection of party dresses from their range currently available and I decided to go for the G21 bird print dress, which is a bargainous £14.
HOAG: "Yes."
O you who believe! When you meet (an enemy) for take a firm stand against them and remember the Name of Allah much (both with tongue and mind), so that you may be successful (V.8:45).
02 Grown Ocean
Make It Personal
Song of the moment: “Rockin’ All Over the World” by the Red Hot Chilli Pipers (yes, Pipers)
Archbishop of New York Cardinal Hayes, once dazzled, now condemned the mayor's amoral ways, opening the flood doors for others to lay the city's problems was Walker's feet. Eventually the accusations reached the ear of governor Franklin D. Roosevelt.
Ethan Wingfield (REP) 9.81% 95
I’ve been getting in my 2 hour walks, heading to the gym, doing some of my P90X workout DVD’s and just trying to get the fitness in as much as possible.
Event host and producer, John Felty of Looking Glass Entertainment said, “Out of all the events that I produce, this is one of my favorites. Hosting the show and doing live interviews and dialog on stage with the artist adds spontaneity and allows the audience a more in depth appreciation for the artists, who they are as people and where the songs come from. It gives me the chance to introduce some great artists to the community in a venue that is superb for songwriters.” Felty is also the producer of Mountain Song Festival, 2013’s inaugural Mountain Song at Sea Bluegrass Cruise in February, The White Squirrel Festival and co-producer of Music on the Mountaintop.
But back to the shoes.. Nike have this little spot in the sole for a pedometer and I thought that would be cool. To know how far I was going. I couldn’t afford to fork out for all the gadgetry that went with it but I had an iPhone 3g and I knew Nike had an app of some sort. The gears were turning in my head and my wife, across town, suddenly had a cold shiver and checked her handbag…
Dead Silent is the second book to feature reluctant private investigator Dylan Scott. I’m so pleased that my publisher wanted more about Dylan because I love him. My editor said of his first appearance: Dylan is a chauvinist and a terrible husband, but I’ve never rooted harder for a character. He is a chauvinist, and his wife despairs of him, but his heart’s in the right place.
--... What I can't do is let Carlos lead while I wrap around him, pulling a distant, yet vaguely lustful expression ... There is some disagreement in the facebook comments as to the literal meaning of this sentence. Is it our correspondent, or is it Carlos pulling the 'distant, yet vaguely lustful' expression? People dancing actual tango generally look like they're enjoying it, although they also look like they're in the moment and concentrating quite hard. They're not pulling silly faces for an audience. But of course, there's no reason to think that either of these people are enjoying anything, and we should remember that there's no actual tango here; the goal is, as we learn later, to make a photograph in which someone looks as though they might be doing something that people who have never actually seen tango, think tango looks like.
"My personal belief is that allowing homosexuals to serve openly would
Other than that, no workouts. Just walking and eating small portions of crap food. I've been so busy, feeling like a chicken with my head cut off, that I'm forgetting to eat, then raiding the empty fridge and settling on things like a tub of cottage cheese with cheesy Ruffles used as a spoon! How's that for honesty? I promise I don't double dip though. Afterall, Nick has to eat out of that container too.
Jewelry: 2 Vivani brand watches (1 black & 1 white), 2 stretch, beaded Banana Republic bracelets, 1 zebra ring, 4 necklaces, 1 ankle bracelet, 5 pair of earrings (brands unknown unless specified).
Yes, it's been a long time. Too long. I offer no excuses to you (if any of you readers are still around). However, I will observe that many of my favourite bloggers (M and S, for instance) have also gone AWOL for extended periods of time. A conspiracy of some sort, you say? Well no, it isn't.
“The men and women of the U.S. Armed Forces have given so much for so many,” said Alan Batey, vice president, Chevrolet sales and service. “This is one small way Chevrolet can say ‘Thank you.’”
“OK”
That's it for now, but I'll be sure to feature more favorites. Now go read their blogs! xoxo
02/15/2012 BUY 0.02 euraud 1.22002 02/17/2012 1.22552 +10.44
Ninja Bank is reported to have taken a hit, but they remain in the black.
1/4 c celery, finely diced
I had some trouble learning how to use the movie editing software; it took me awhile to get the hang of splicing up the clips I collected as well as adding titles and the music. Other than that I think the whole process went smoothly, I went to the writing center and met with some of the tutors there and they liked my idea and thought it would be a cool way to get my point across.
But I don't do double exclamation marks, that is just wrong.
(Here is my son on the plane)
Sent: Wednesday, April 04, 2012 7:24 PM
You can also roll from your back to your side,
Thank you Lord the Lord says there is someone here tonight he said the evil cloud over your family has been rolled away.
Other things I hope to make soon are:
Hood inhaled deeply on his pipe and wondered how much longer his tobacco stash could be preserved.
And if you go in, should you turn left or right…or right-and-three-quarters? Or, maybe, not quite? Or go around back and sneak in from behind? Simple it’s not, I’m afraid you will find, for a mind-maker-upper to make up his mind.
As soon as the cake comes out of the oven, place the pan on a wire rack, poke the cake all over with a thin skewer, and brush it with about 1/3 of the syrup. Let the cake cool in the pan for 10 minutes. Invert it onto a 10-inch cardboard round or serving plate. Brush the top and sides of the cake with the remaining syrup. Cool completely and wrap airtight.
may came home with a smooth round stone
"Yes - I bet the aboriginals have more than one word for it."
The cost of living matters because:
Andy is set free on bail and Nick is nowhere to be found because he’s too busy following his wife, who is meeting with a random man. But then Andy turns up, hanging from a tree. How he’s not dead is beyond me. The group that attacked him- again, dressed in flashy costumes- just left him beaten to a pulp, encouraged by a surrounding crowd. With pressure increasing, a bunch of women go undercover as potential victims and Amanda finds two of the vigilantes- in the middle of an assault on “Fanastica”
Keep in mind these stat priorities are my own opinion, but they work very well for me.
At this point I figure the data is still pretty sketchy, but I think it's a good idea to be aware of the potential for risk and keep attuned as more research is done, and in the meantime enjoy mate in moderation, which is no problem for me. While I like mate very much, I wouldn't describe myself as a habitual drinker. I'll make a batch only a few times a week, and only drink about two to three infusions at a time. I suppose that's well within the range of safety.
About 400g rhubarb
Now comes even more proof that meditation does something profound, and beneficial, to the human brain. A follow-up study by the UCLA team just published in the online edition of the journal NeuroImage shows that people who meditate have stronger connections between brain regions. What’s more, they have far less age-related brain atrophy.
In the end, Mexico's efforts to promote Mexico as a partner in progress with the U.S. was lost to an American illusion schizophrenically divided between fantasies of American leadership toward, and refuge from, modernity. The Illusion of Ignorance argues that American ignorance of the experience of other nations is not so much a barrier to better understanding of the world, but a strategy Americans have chosen to maintain their vision of the U.S. relationship with the world.
Those of you on twitter may have seen a fair few insanely early tweets from me - not all of which are grumpy, mind you. As at least getting up so early means I'm usually ready nice and calmly (albeit slugishly!!).
- More manga!: the lack of manga is I guess due to the fact that I stopped reading them for a while but my interest in them arose again recently so you can expect them soon. By soon I mean today.
We are the family of God, but it just feels so good when we act like it.
Today we are confirming that the TBS crew will be going back to the town of Oban on the Western Coast of Scotland this summer.
Celina writes,
We've gotten that comment, mostly from kids. The adults are a bit more discerning in their questioning, asking if we worry about college or how we learn about physics or what our days look like because they could never "stand to be home with their kids" every day. It's ok, it's normal to misunderstand something that's out of your realm of experience, but to unschoolers, who operate on the belief that learning happens all the time - ALL*THE*TIME - it does, truthfully, get a little tiresome after a while.
I'm back from my trip, and I have so much to share!
4. Why does Christianity look the way it does today? (I’m a Christian and I wonder this.)
Alice In Chains - Nothing Safe
She raised her hand but the man caught her wrist.
Pascal . . . goes on contradicting us, bothering us, bugging us, until we understand the truth about ourselves. And the truth about ourselves is that we are a mystery, not a problem; a monster, not a puzzle; a living self-contradiction who needs to be contradicted if he is to understand himself.
A word of thanks to all at the USA Goshin-Ryu Karate Dojo (Bogota, NJ) who shared an intriguing Sanchin Session Wednesday, February 8th, 2012 (Left to Right: Sensei Bob W., Sensei Pablo P., Me, Shihan Ken Z., Sensei Scott Z.) – thanks for a great night. Shihan Zuck is director of the Flanders Isshinryu Do-Kai and a member of American Isshinryu / OIKKA.
one brick upon another. Neighbors turned
Enjoy Yourself; It’s Later Than You Think
I saw My Chemical Romance on Friday. The Architects opened first, and they were awesome. And I'm sorry G.Way- no amount of convincing on your part can make me love the second opener (Thursday- seriously, their name was Thursday). I could hear Thursday's singer over the instruments, except for when I covered my ears- then somehow I could hear all the words to the songs. And they still weren't that awesome. To each his own. Oh, and the lead singer came off as kind of a jackass when he swung his microphone several times over his head during the course of the performance.
Continuing Education credit hours available at no extra charge for professionals.
come from?” The disciples were professional fishermen, and knew all the
It was sad and depressing to see how many people got disappointed over and over again, because very many farmers depend on the rain. One of them being my dad.
Celia Reynolds is the youngest in a set of triplets and the one with the least valuable power. Anne can see the future, and Jane can see the present, but all Celia can see is the past. And the past seems so insignificant -- until Celia meets Lo.
oh yeah, hasn’t Carrie got an amazing voice? so amazing that I have already asked her to voice Violet Rain in the up coming animated Comic I’m working on =)
- 1 teaspoon baking soda
It was decided at last week’s meeting that the works would be grouped by author. That seems sensible. It allows an audience to sample a couple of pieces by an author and move on, if that author doesn’t suit the reader’s taste. If the reader likes what an author writes, then there will be several choice morsels to sample.
THE GOOD:
The blue print of the National Broadband Plan to connect 160million Indian households with high speed Internet connections by 2014 will be end by the fiscal, Telecom minister Kapil Sibal, said at a roundtable meeting with various stakeholders.
The DSC had asked Bhansali to pay Romani `Rs.10 lakh as remuneration and by way of damages, and to give him credit in a separate card reading, 'Story By Taabish Romani' in all the subsequent copies of the film and film's publicity material.
Happy Easter
During Preparation Week:
I was glad to have an excuse to bring out the Vagabond I bought a little while ago. (It's a motorised die-cutter, see the YouTube video here). My friend had a good idea of what she wanted and we made a quick dash to the wedding stationery shop in the nick of time before it closed.
As a substitute for the 3 cups of all-purpose or wheat flour, I used instead:
When you think of wind energy, you may visualize physicists designing wind farms, technicians maintaining the turbines or many of the other career paths available in wind energy, but do you consider who makes the turbines?
I keep forgetting to take pictures of the garden, but here are some flowers in a bouquet, that are blooming now.
I saw ‘run down house’ and I pictured ‘run down house’. Poe spent all of that effort trying to communicate exactly how the house was run down, all that time trying to make sure that his readers had the same picture as him in their heads.
All told it took me about 30 minutes to do these three rolls. Not bad for some custom tape. Now I never have to worry about running out of my favorite supplies while working on my art journal!
There comes a point where you hit an obstacle that tries to destroy what you believe in. This is one of them. On one hand, I realize what all is going in my life can be considered crazy to some; but after some of the things I’ve seen and heard– this is tame. But even though I acknowledge that these things that are happening are not of my doing (or my current life– none of this was or is mine), my mind cannot help but whisper
Who haste to climb,
BUBOES are naturally camouflaged and receive +4 to hide when lurking amongst rocks or in underbrush.
How do you eat your spaghetti?
A previous Oscar winner, and nominee at the show Nicole Kidman showed up with her husband. Nicole Kidman is usually known for being spot on with her Oscar outfits. Yet this years gown left a lot to be desired. This white Dior Haute Couture gown mostly resembled a table cloth. Her shoes were by Pierre Hardy but the only remotely redeeming elements were the hair and the Fred Leighton choker around her neck.
I am, with all that, in a lucky situation. When I started writing just as the U.S. and the rest of the West were beginning to crumble financially, in 2006, I had already had a long, well rewarded professional career. We lived frugally. I don’t have to worry how we will pay the grocery bill tomorrow. We don’t have dependents. I don’t have to cool my heels in any publisher’s antechamber or Inbox. What Baron Bodissey and Dymphna have to go through, or Fjordman who is in exile too, and doesn’t have the cushion I have, is so much harder. Derbyshire too, who has posted photos of his children training at a rifle range, just in case.
of that Bruch Konzertstück.
If I wait a week and drive down with spouse, the money issue won't be such an issue.
Chocolate Drizzle
Tuesday - Work and almost back to 'normal' (excuse the cheeky grin, I was laughing right before my photographer snapped this picture)
GREASE MONKEY: "So you want $1.00 back?"
This portends extremely serious problems for both the United States and Panama. A large percentage of Panamanian citizens want the U.S. to come back and restore the Canal Zone as before. Incidentally, the treaty giving the canal to Panama was never properly ratified. There were two versions of the treaty: an English version and a Spanish version. These two versions were not the same. The Senate ratified one version and the Panamanians ratified the other version. And the treason goes on and on.
only thing left is to deliver it.
You can read my reviews and follow links to interviews, blogs and other reviews by clicking on the authors' names. The winner will be announced on 5th July at a ceremony at the Free Word Centre in London.
Better to be out there competing, and fine-tuning as you go along.
So why doesn’t the U.S. government just fire up the printing presses and print a bunch of money to pay off the debt? For one very simple reason. For more dollars to enter the system, the U.S. government has to go into more debt. The U.S. government does not issue U.S. currency – the Federal Reserve does.
Bling: Irock
"Evening Mirror"
50. 1/2 WAY THERE!!
It is suppose to house my vacuum. Do you see a vacuum?
Vermandel was twenty-two when she moved to London hoping to build up a career as photographer there. She didn't have many contacts, but she knew there was no place in Belgium for the sort of images she wanted to create. London was a tough city, but one where you could get a chance. And that is what happened. In the past her photographs, bereft of all glamour, appeared in the observer and the independent magazine and she worked for W, the Wire, Mojo and British Vogue.
Partly because I was in a hurry and partly because the salad plates I'm using inspired me to aim for a quiet simplicity, the settings aren't elaborate -- just a dinner plate, salad plate, cloth napkins, and one glass per place setting. Instead of a floral centerpiece, I used single fern fronds in julep cups (silverplated goblets on the smaller table) and tealight candles in glass holders down the center of the table.
In the Couchiching tradition, our guests and participants are invited to speak openly and frankly, and to engage in non-partisan, provocative and free debate. Accordingly, this evening will be conducted off the record under the Chatham House Rule. Attendance is limited and we welcome your participation.
This caused me to think: of the nurse or junior doctor in a mental health unit at night who has a quite unpredicted and unpredictable need to administer medication by force, or to move someone to a seclusion facility using restraint techniques. Where do operational officers stand if they are called to assist?
To survive at this job you have to learn to go with the flow or you might get swept away.
Chelsea, Matt, and I were also considering starting a blog for Cat’s Cradle and feeding that into the News page, but for now, a Twitter-feed will have to suffice. The shelter just does not have the time or resources to run a blog, plus the Facebook pages and Twitter account.
NORFOLK, VIRGINIA – There’s outrage in Norfolk, Va., today after a white couple was attacked by a group of dozens of black teenagers, and the local newspaper did not report on the incident for two weeks, despite the victims being employees of the paper.
On Sunday, May 1, 2011, President Obama commandeered the global airways with a cold hearted mechanical straight face and announced the liquidation and extrajudicial murder of an unarmed and defenseless Bogey-Straw Man of Osama Bin Laden and yet another mindless brutal and deadly assault against people of color in the sovereign nation of Pakistan. After the onslaught on what appeared to have been a defenseless family, Pakistan authorities found at least 3 bodies of men in pools of blood slain at the scene.[12]
This week London is host to The Clean Energy Ministerial and Sustainable Energy for All (SE4ALL) in which international energy ministers will set the agenda for the UN sustainable development conferences which take place later in June and decide how to deliver energy to the world’s poorest people and promote a clean energy future.
Either way, when your abode is filling with murky water, and the options for resolutionary action are non-existent, it is a very unfortunate time for your phone to be out of service.
I submitted my query letter and first 3 chapters to Avalon and waited for what felt like forever. I might have been a bit anxious. Maybe it was closer to a couple of weeks.
simultaneously highlighting their vulnerable femininity and making me
I'm just glad all this happened now and not when we got to BsAs and were in his "temple" as he called it.
… remind the people of Jerusalem of their disgusting sins and tell them that I … am saying: Jerusalem, you were born in the country where Canaanites lived. Your father was an Amorite, and your mother was a Hittite. When you were born, no one cut you loose from your mother or washed your body. No one rubbed your skin with salt and olive oil, and wrapped you in warm blankets. Not one person loved you enough to do any of these things, and no one even felt sorry for you. You were despised, thrown into a field, and forgotten. I saw you lying there, rolling around in your own blood, and I couldn’t let you die. I took care of you, like someone caring for a tender, young plant. You grew up to be a beautiful young woman with perfect breasts and long hair, but you were still naked.
B8/38’s Exploration Details 20
Random: I really haven’t watched Ru Paul’s Drag Race at all this season. I’m watching reruns on demand and I forgot how funny it was.
and there was originally 12 of them -
Is this where our friendship dies?
Al-Bashir on Monday arrived at the strategic area of Heglig in South Kordofan State, three days after it was restored by the Sudanese army from South Sudan army which occupied the area on April 10.
You can go swimming with the sharks and rays, you can climb the volcano, or just chill on the beach.
I lust after the miniature paintings of my friend Leslie Smith, a Royal Academy of Art graduate. This is a photo of his display.
A monthly update on press coverage of the international illegal ivory trade.
There are actually ten “books” in the Apicius writings that (sort of) add up to a complete treatise on cooking. The books are named in honour of Apicius, who was known for his love of fine food, but were actually compiled long after his death. And I think that’s more than enough facts for now.
Rakeback rebates inside the poker rooms of this site are really I testing and are enticing the new payers daily. You have to learn the best way to earn a lot more funds from rakeback rebates. The rakeback rebates are based on your monthly gross revenues which are consistently keeps on increasing as you keep on playing. Rakeback.com provides a great rebate on your MGR inside the poker room.
Martha's Monster Make-up art Ken Reid
Yesterday, 6/4/2012, Krioneri, near Athens, a car stopped on the railway lines.
I know this blogger personally. She is a precious soul. And her heart is just like His.
OK. Thanks for reading this. I'll try to get another post up soon that shows what I'm working on right now. What I'm doing is picking out some of the pieces in the newest Alabama Chanin book, making them up following (more or less) her included patterns, and then seeing how they fit and making necessary adjustments. I think I've got The Perfect Pattern for the bolero (tweaking the back, adjusting the sleeves), and I want to make a bunch of those. They may be the perfect garment for me: 1) they're something easy to toss on when it's chilly (I have to carry something with me in the spring and summer and fall (when it's over 80 outside) because the buildings are all icy inside, and I freeze just going into the post office and 2) they're very small, as garments go, so you can do a ton of embellishment that would take forever on a larger piece. Plus--the coolest part--I can make one out of a really large t-shirt. I can get cotton t-shirts for less than $1 each at Goodwill on Sundays, and I'm amassing a collection--the problem is that everyone wants really big t-shirts, apparently, so they're hard to find. And also most of them have a logo on the front and, often, on the back as well. So I have to hunt for ones that have enough blank fabric to get the sleeves--the tiny body of the bolero isn't a problem, but the sleeves require more fabric. It's an experiment--I'm thinking of piecing some of them to make my own fabric. We'll see how that goes~~
Roodt writes that he wanted her to repeat her astonishing story in front of his video camera in exactly that same casual, humorous and resigned manner she had told it the first time.
08-29 Halden, Norway - Fredriksten Festning
I was going to write a post about why I think I’m so obsessed with cooking and writing about food. It’s about self-nurturing.
Jesus is however a careful teacher so makes sure we don't get him wrong by adding a plain language summary at the end of the Matthew 25 passage:
1) Get to the movie theater exactly 30 minutes AFTER the movie starts and just have Joe sit in there saving our seats until we get there.
fly along the coastline a further distance to gather their food when the wildflowers in the fields are cut. The wild roses are now gone and early golden rod is showing itself along the hedgerows, together with the purple (thornless) Nova Scotia thistle.
The songs come a weird points and serve only as roadblocks which make sure you are a further 5 minutes away from the end and nothing else.
lace is from my local store
I know music appreciation is a subjective matter but I am comfortable calling "Hard Hitter" the best library record I have ever heard. It boggles my mind to think that De Wolfe haven't seen fit to make this collection commercially available, I'm sure it would sell through the roof. So please make it a priority to download this because you never know with the file sharing situation how long some of these gems will be available. And be sure to leave a message for Retro if you enjoy "Hard Hitter" even half as much as I do.
The word “Public Purpose”, as defined in the Act mentioned above refers to the acquisition of land for putting up educational institutions or schemes such as housing, health or slum clearance, apart from the projects for rural planning or formation of sites.
for the newlyweds.
What or who would you let go of?
We couldn't agree more.
Would I have wanted it to be any different? While I was growing up in it … I would have said, ‘please couldn’t it be different?’
The TV show seemed familiar like I had seen it before in real life and/or in a past dream or something like that, but I can not remember the plot or anything; but I think that one character reminded somewhat of the actor James McAvoy.
James 3:1-12
I should have walked away.
And the view from my window this week
Please list plaintiff's fee management structure with Tiger Management and Morgan Creek Management, and any and all fee structure changes for plaintiff's management of Tiger, Morgan Creek, et al., including the dates of the changes.
See how I've left the tree, decorated with all the sentimental ornaments by the kids.
"Did those tap shoes make it the dance on time? I can't believe your mother went to seven thrift stores because the new shoes didn't arrive! She is SO funny. Did she really whack that other mother with a tap shoe or was that a joke for the blog?"
Hee hee! I talk all about that in my new book. You guys can pre-order it HERE. Come on, you know you want to. (Really, I'm not just saying that because I have insane insurance premiums and medical bills to pay.)
As the waves of sleep receded, I put two and two together.
Oh, and while I was researching all those other side effects, I found out that it could be that the Aciphex, which I take for my ulcers, could be eroding my hip joints, causing my hip pain. Nice.
A compelling approach to the issue of using value-added scores in teacher evaluations is found in the Hechinger Report blog post of Columbia University sociologist Aaron Pallas. Pallas sensibly suggests that where value-added models of standardized test scores are included in a teacher evaluation, the scoring needs to take into account the margin of error in a teacher’s score.
I could do a whole post of great remixes. I’ll have to remind myself to do that in the future.
The question: Are small victories meaningful or is the outcome already predetermined? Casey suggests we're at the beginning of what "promises to be a protracted fight over whether the [Forensic Science Commission] will become a national model of how to improve the use of science in fighting crime, or just another secretive, bureaucratic body perceived as protecting licensed professionals rather than policing them." But I don't see a "protracted fight." Nobody presently on the commission is pushing to make it a "national model." At best some on the commission are resisting, but under its new chairman's leadership the agency has already become a "secretive, bureaucratic body perceived as protecting licensed professionals rather than policing them." There's no need to speculate: We're there now.
3. April 11
Fry in iron skillet ten minutes for breakfast. Gritz should be made in cold weather only. Small pig's head may be used instead of pork sides. After having made gritz once, each cook can determine whether she needs more oats, less meat or more seasoning.
So yes, in my opinion, Chen Guangcheng is made of some pretty stern stuff. That doesn’t mean that taking him in isn’t a risk. China isn’t a country to take lightly. If we push them enough, they will push back. I’m worried about what form that pushing might take.
When federal income tax rate cuts are eliminated; when tax “refunds” are given to citizens (and non-citizens); when death tax rates increase; when road and bridge surcharge fees are being invented; when fines for not shoveling your sidewalk are levied; when fees for lighting your street lights are charged and stormwater fees are created where none existed previously; and when other new “fees and fines” seem to be a weekly occurance; and it has become increasingly clear that government cannot live within its means and may be out of control…it’s probably time to contact your city council, county commissioners, state legislators and congressional representatives, who can turn around this runaway train, and tell them “enough is enough!”
Eastbound and Down (HBO)
Rather, my "Day of Integration" will teach people how to live constructively in a Western Society, and will include seminars on how to chat up girls, without setting fire to them, how to behave in polite society, and how to enjoy hilarious, satirical cartoons without looking for an embassy to bomb. Simple lessons on "no means no" for first dates, and how to let a woman have an opinion without responding with a punch to the face.
Steven Tyler walked up the driveway to the entrance of the Playboy Mansion in Los Angeles like it was a second home. Surrounded by a large entourage as he was led to the red carpet, Tyler stopped to bare a Cheshire Cat’s grin as he looked at the four lovely Playboy Bunnies waiting to pose for pictures with him. The rock star and the equally iconic home that has hosted thousands of parties seemed made for each other, but this was Tyler’s first visit ever to the Holmby Hills grounds.
"We are now processing the 'Application of Immigrant Visa & Alien Registration' form and I need some information from you. I am scanning you a copy of the draft form for you to fill out the missing information in a separate piece of paper … "
Ohtsuki commented very kindly on Morning Musume as the actresses, “Out of the blue.” “The contents of my novel have a sense of a lot of madness going about it. It has an inconsistent and cruel feel to it. A story about being in conflict with yourself when having to kill someone you once loved again and again, it’s a sad story. Which is why I’d like Morning Musume to act this. He said as though he “yelled” (in support) to the members.
This simple and elegant process begins to produce new topsoil within the year, with dramatic results reported in three years. The higher the biomass and turnover of plant roots, the faster new topsoil will form.
Increasing unemployment like this is doubly bad: Less taxpayers and more people needing government assistance.
“I know lots of things. Like I know our time is short but you’re a really smart lady and not going to waste any more time. I know that you have a story you’ve never told anyone and you’re about to tell me right this instant. Then everything’s going to be better. You can do this. All you need to do is take one of my magic beans, make a wish, and just like that, life becomes a Fairy Tale.” Jack dips his thumb and finger into his can of beans, as if feeling around for the one that just feels right, pinching it between his finger then drawing up and out like a golden prize wrestled free and hard-won. Jack looks at the next bean of his to give, one more after thousands, then extends his offering. Urging Mattie as her long road of miles come to an end.
Drinking and driving may be a French national sport, but E doesn't engage in it, which is good: someone has to be sober on these little back roads. Still, one day as we tootled along, I couldn't resist asking him to pull in to one winery, which is one of my very favorites around here, so I could take a nice clichéd photo:
There are also contemporary accounts, and for my Crimean novel I’m lucky to have had imaginative writers on the spot. From Times Correspondent William Howard Russell I heard the screaming of birds under the booming of cannon, and from Alexander Kinglake the swish of the Highlanders' kilts as they marched through the long grass. Most of all I remember Lord George Paget’s diary reference to the ‘terrible slosh’ of a cannonball ripping into the belly of a man behind him. That one piece of onomatopoeia brought with it the sight and smell and touch, the wetness of the impact, the slurry on the cheek of the man next to him, the frailty and horror of it, one word for a death, slosh.
Braided belt, thrifted
Screamed Shag.
About nine hours later I found a road. Although it wasn’t defined nor really divided to look like one, I picked a direction and headed out.
The festival is designed as a meeting for the souls, a search for roots in tradition, an opening to spirituality.
The new crops in the Comoros, Zanzibar, Brazil and Madagascar “are also small; all these are getting booked in forward sales. With Indonesian cigar companies buying up crops, the local Indian markets will soon dry up. It will see Rs 1,200 a kg, it is good time for traders to buy cloves and hold them for a while,” the market sources said.
Luck also played a good part here. The convention hotel had a breakfast buffet with a great deal of fresh fruit, egg white omelets and plain grits. I was able to eat a large breakfast for less than ten Points+ and not need a large lunch. I was also luck that there was a very limited supply of the beverage I like to drink. I’m partial to dark, un-spiced rum and there was a distinct lack of dark rum.
Of the three ideas, I prefer this one myself, since it’s the easiest and most plausible. I don’t think it needs to be pigeonholed into humans being ‘hardier’, per se, but if you are inventing aliens, you can pretty easily make them all so physically different that their uniqueness becomes clear. In order to do this, though, you’re going to have to think harder about how your aliens work. So, like, if humans are the only intelligent bipeds around, what does that mean for how all those aliens construct their buildings and castles and spaceships? Stuff is bound to get weird fast (which is how I like it).
Now if we can send people to the moon, are you telling me they have no idea how to fix this disaster in the gulf.
So, hats off to Teen Titles and the dedicated adults behind it and if you're interested in getting it for your school or library or for yourself, contact the address you'll find on this website.
After running a total of half a mile for the calibration, I then ran 2 miles at a 6:55 pace!! Perfect!!!
It also turns out that the show isn't so much a show as...an infomercial. “When I was on WAPT-16," Lynch quotes Webb as saying, "I would buy a block of time, and you have 28 minutes and 30 seconds. That’s basically how it works, only instead of selling a blender, it will actually be a show.”
Three (3) bottles of 12 ounces or larger (but no larger than 750ml) per entry (beer must be brewed at home)
was disappointing. The big surprise for me was how good the dark
But recently….this lens has become clouded and murky. It no longer provides the clarity that I once had and everything seems blurry and out of perspective. I have tried to clean it in vain, but as much as I polished and rubbed, everything remained out of focus and I was getting more and more frustrated as the days wore on.
And in the category of "maybe, possibly, someday traditions", we have Spain:
Instead, I'm making the following New Year's Resolutions about beer and whiskey.
I've got round to updating the map - sorry about that, I forgot about it for about a year. It's mainly useful for the regular events in London, but I've included the ones further afield, or that I've only been to once, because it's just kind of fun to have a picture of where I've been.
But over the summer, I began to get my hopes up that my patron might pay for me to compete Pro-Am at a big competition in mid-November. In addition to that, I knew I would be performing in a showcase one a week before the competition, so I figured that even if I didn't end up going to the competition, it would be a big enough motivation that I could get the gown built in time for the showcase, rather than trying to fancy-up my practice skirt with sparkly accessories like I did last year. So I pulled the box out of the closet in August, and began to make peace with it. I began by patterning and building the foundation leotard, which unfortunately I did not document with photos. But that's the lighter purple color that you can see peeking between the appliques.
What’s the difference between Tylenol and Advil?
Well there you are world, my brutally honest sharing of my mental state. I ‘know’ I don’t suck as a writer but right now I ‘feel’ like a suck at writing and I’m not sure how much I care.
But the biggest difference between Dream Dad and Dying Dad was his face - rosy-cheeked, healthy and happy. He had the most beatific smile on his face as he laughed with BT and looked out to the ocean with the others. Although an inland country kid, he adored the beach and moved us to the North Coast of NSW (arguably some of the best surf in Australia) when I was 2 years old.
1 rubber
But through all time our friendship lasts,
When I was growing up, there was only one prominent atheist, Madelyn Murray O’Hair. Back then, every Catholic, indeed every Christian, ignored her as an oddity. Today’s atheists are legion. They have an agenda and their names are familiar.
and her little turtle one.
Now, I'm not saying that this is connected, although the call centre operative at Parcel Force I spoke to earlier seemed to think so, when I dropped a parcel off last Friday at the Post Office in Holme Street it wasn't collected. It was given back to me today and I was told that the driver had refused it and that I should phone Parcel Force.
When it comes to learning music or a foreign language, even a little exposure supposedly enables people to learn more deeply later in life. This may be true in other disciplines as well. Students who are taught logic may forget they even heard the word syllogism, but they may have an unconscious understanding of how to construct a logical argument.
How do I spotless superlative greyness adornment?
A brilliant dark comedy that lambasts everyone and everything. It has a simple theme, you’re an idiot if you didn’t already know that cigarettes were harmful and you’re an idiot to defend them and you’re an idiot to attack them—grow up and take responsibility for your own actions. Lobbyists, politician, the press, the public are all shown to be the idiots they are…and if there is one thing that isn’t funny about this movie is that it isn’t that far off from reality.
Beautiful Ee-va.
On a camping trip with their boyfriends, best friends Amelia and Gemma are having a great time. However, when the boys have trouble lighting the barbeque, the girls decide it’s time to leave them to it and beat a hasty retreat to the shower block. Once there, they take a seriously steamy shower together and become oblivious to everything except the taste of one another.
Course in miracles
This condemnation of evidently racist UMNO though, is a positive development and could possibly be taken to indicate a (unfortunately glacial) step in the right direction. The people can even if need be, indeed move ahead of the Rulers and the failed constitution (ask around in any international groupings the constitution is institutionalized Apartheid back with more Apartheid laws), but that will be a sad day and hopefully one that does not result in so many unstable region’s actions, that the powers that be, may be too late to correct, only to suffer social and reputational consequences for later . . . against such reasonable demands of normal world citizens too unfortunately!
I want to you to kiss me, beat me, and make me write bad checks. I want you to slap me silly. I want to worship you. I want you to grow tomatoes in my backyard. I want you to grill steaks, shoot deer, shovel snow and take the garbage out at night. I want you in all your manly manliness. All your girth. Your wisdom. Your big head, your devilish smirk.
This change will affect next year’s freshman, as well as next year’s upperclassmen.
Cap makes the odd comment about the mistakes in the intervening years, and is clearly and regularly baffled by the modern world. Nonetheless, he reminds us that not everyone from our past was a racist ass and shows strength of character in not constantly disavowing the modern age. Rather, he does what he has always done best, and lets the others deal with the stuff he doesn’t understand. This portrayal is by far my favourite, staying well away from the dull, boyscout portrayals of Superman or the X-Men’s Cyclops from their respective franchises.
And finally, here's the payoff...my sweet new (used) iPod touch! I've been wanting one forever, I found this one lightly used, and I grabbed it. And I may never take it off again...
“Unless you’re going to be transgendered one day in which case you’re miserable being a boy named Sam and you really wish you were a girl named Samantha argo you’re a mixed-up chameleon. And really who isn’t???”
But put ye on the Lord Jesus Christ, and make not provision for the flesh, to fulfil the lusts thereof.
As I was waiting for it to stop rolling and calm down, I thought to myself:
Ryman, along with Frank Stella, is often seen as forerunners to Minimalism and the debate over aesthetics and truth in painting which has ensued ever since. Whatever side one takes in such a debate, Ryman’s work continues to dazzle in terms of making a viewer look closely at how a painting works, how an image can be dismantled, and how paint can to certain degree be itself again.
This article is not intended to upset or offend anyone who may have gone through the pain of termination. My sympathies are with anyone who has experienced pregnancy loss of any form.
Project pony #9 is a 5 year old OTTB who apparently was restarted under saddle and taught how to w-t-c after leaving the track. He was then turned out for the winter and whoever had him didn't seem to feel the need to feed him much. Peter came to the barn with two other OTTB, all three who were very skinny, have horrible coats, and need some feet work. One of them had a chronic abscess in his foot that they never bothered to treat.
"That's what I thought but I can't find him anywhere and was hoping he was with you."
The ones I like most so far are:
Today we live in a multi-core world. Back in the old days if you wanted to be outrageous you bought yourself two processors and hoped you could find a motherboard to put them both in. Then you hoped you had an operating system that could actually use them. Linux did. BeOS definitely did. Windows, well, not so much. Windows NT kind of did, but it never got rockin’ until NT 4 showed up. And even then it wasn’t that great until XP showed up.
Of course, I had to choose an area of focus, so I chose Domo! He's quite popular right now, and I lucked out recently finding some clearance-priced Domos. So I'm attempting to sell them at fair prices--more than what I paid, less than retail price (depending on the particular outlet).
This story just gets more and more preposterous, and predictably the verminous little eunuchs at the New York Times, instead of backing down and throwing a bone or two to the Gods of Reasonableness, plunge deeper and deeper into the cesspool of the make-believe black victimhood at the hands of evil oppressive racist white society, narrative.
BOO-YAH! I gotcha! Hahahahahahahaha–victory is mine!
Michael and I will battle it out. And yes, may the best woman win.
Finally I must say a very big and heartfelt thank you to everyone who took the time to email, text, message and Tweet me to see how I was - and even now continue to check up on me. You really did make me feel loved and wanted and cared for, and in an often faceless digital world, it showed me exactly why I needed to come back to this blog and be with you all again.
* Sales & Marketing Assistant Manager
Peter Butterworth is excellent and gives a wonderful comic turn as the Monk. He is also involved in one of the best cliffhangers ever in Doctor Who, when Vicki and Steven stumble across his TARDIS! Imagine what that would have been like as a viewer in 1965. Another TARDIS and another 'Time Lord.' Although we won't hear them called that for some time to come, so for now we'll call him another of the Doctor's race. Inside the Monk's superior Mark IV Tardis, with working chameleon circuit disguising it as a saxon sarcophagus Vicki and Steven discover a collection, something from every period and place and a journal detailing how the Monk discussed principals of powered flight with Da Vinci. He also goes on to boast that the britons would never have made stone henge without using his anti gravity lift. Thanks for clearing that one up Mr. Spooner.
Oh, and by the way, I purchased a rug from this post, but had to take it back because the pile was too high to fit under the front door when opened. Sigh. Onward and upward, and more shopping! :)
The situation has gotten pathetic enough for Arnett to post a picture of his ailing dad with tubes running out of his chest in an attempt to gain public sympathy. He’s also released a letter to the media. I doubt any of it will make a difference. Derek Dooley has a principle to maintain, which seems to be making players who no longer wish to be in his program grovel on their way out the door.
Chocolate dipped pretzel rods
Cricut Personal, Create, Expression, Cake Mini and Cake - Power the Cricut on. During startup you will see the version number on the screen.
Zynga is a difficult stock. I predicted it had a way to fall from $10, and I think that at $8.95 (where it closed up today), it has risen a way above what I would consider a fair value.
Ashton: Thanks Will. If I didn't have my family I would just ask someone to kill me because I would want to be with them.
Slowly interspersed in space in the quantum-mevon world
Then I thought maybe it was a hangover...but then I remembered that you usually need to have had some alcohol the night before and, although I had a glass or 3 of wine, that shit's normal for me...PLUS, there is no way I'm going to get medevac'd from a hangover, so I totally threw that one out.
The fact that shit-ass gangster rappers adulate pimps is one of a number of reasons why I have no use for gangster rappers. Or gangsters.
I miss that day. Our April 28th.
TECHNOLOGY
Before The Body Wins, Sarah Jaffe had released one full-length album and a pair of EPs, all of which showcase a moody, laconic, singer-songwriterly country-folk sound. They're each enormously promising — from the early gem "Even Born Again" to the breakthrough ballad "Clementine," all the way through a strangely sweet cover of Drake's "Shut It Down" — but none suggest the stylistic leap Jaffe takes on The Body Wins.
Me: I'm sorry, I forgot. You could have called me as well, though.
04. History book 4:41
And go take that California trip
Today a great Scottish city and many would say the "greatest Scottish city", Glasgow, finally died.
A few weeks ago, I came home as soon as my last class of the day ended in order to drive my husband to a car dealership on the far side of the city. His vehicle maintenance was completed, but to pick the car up we needed to get there before the service department closed. As I backed my SUV out of the driveway, he turned to me and said, “Just stop at the courthouse for a minute, I need to register my car.” We stopped. He was in and out in less than ten minutes, and we picked up his car with five minutes to spare. In Houston, if you couldn’t register by mail, you planned at least half a day to get the job done. I know I’ll miss the lack of lines, the friendly helpfulness of unstressed civil servants, and police who hand out more warnings than tickets.
Where may the grave of that good man be? –
We have been psyching her up for today for about a week. She seemed excited to start using the potty and to wear her Kai Lan underwear. We told her that she would be a big girl. That she would get chocolate. And prizes! I forgot about those last two so they didn't happen. Nit that it mattered. Once we got going, she was all in, candy or not.
“I lived at the end of the Book of Mormon. I was asked to take all of the records that had been kept by our prophets and copy them into one record. This record would be preserved by the Lord for a people far into the future. Who am I?” (Mormon) “Book of Mormon Stories” -118 (This belt can be used alone and tied either in the front or back. It can also be tied around a length of cloth draped over the shoulder.)
All I could do is laugh. LOL at Richard Grenell.
Merriam Webster defines it as "a region or scene of simple pleasure and quiet"
to lips pursed in that black womb
Sturridge opened the account for The blues, just in 45 seconds, after the referee’s whistle, from the distance of 25 yards . Shortly after 11 minutes, Terry scored from heading with the assistance of Mata. From Kalou’s assistance, Torres kissed the net in 13 minutes.
Symphony No. 3; Piano Trio in F major
Here are the other up coming Classic Doctor Who DVD range releases:
It's been a while, and other things seem to have come between me and finishing the process of properly claiming this award.... I suspect it's that fear of success again, in my mother's voice, demanding, "Who the hell do you think you are?"
“In a future Chicago, 16-year-old Beatrice Prior must choose among five predetermined factions to define her identity for the rest of her life, a decision made more difficult when she discovers that she is an anomaly who does not fit into any one group, and that the society she lives in is not perfect after all.” – Goodreads Blurb
Fresh Pork Sausage with Pepper and Sage
During their time with Modo, students have had the chance to get involved in all aspects of the company. One of Modo’s current placement students, Jack Dominy, came along to the talk to offer an insight into the experience that he has gained during his time with Modo. The placement often involves seeing projects through from the very first e-mail that come into Modo from the client, pitching the initial ideas, refining a design, getting quotes from suppliers, sampling the product and overseeing a full production run. During this process, the students gain invaluable experience communicating and working in a professional environment as well as building up a huge body of design concepts for a portfolio. As Modo are so heavily involved with production, there’s a fantastic opportunity to learn about the materials, processes and specialist print finishes.
The immigrant experience is not for the faint of heart. Merely living abroad in one Western country instead of another has produced misunderstandings, depression, and wry amusements.
Chase Christmas Tree
﻿I also painted all of the trim in Ralph Lauren Picket Fence, leftover from painting my living room. One day all of the trim and all of the doors in my house will be this shade of white. It's perfect. Crisp and clean but still with a bit of life to it. And can I just say how much I ADORE Ralph Lauren paint? It was a bit thick after sitting in my shed for two years, but still went on smoothly (after much mixing) and was so much easier to apply than drippy, thin Behr. Really wish Home Depot still carried it, but I'd drive an hour (or order online) to get some more Picket Fence.
Huckleberry Finn
If you’re the person that received this drawing or you know the person who received this drawing, I would love to hear from you! I made that drawing before I started this blog so unfortunately my blog wouldn’t be listed behind the drawing.
18.Frank Blevins + His Tar Heel Rattlers - I've Got No Honey
To come full circle on this, therefore, if one were to worry less, or be less stressed, then one could reduce the chances of wrinkles appearing even if our skin will inevitably become less elastic as we age. The skin’s elasticity and the mind’s ‘elasticity’ could perhaps be related. I’ll leave that as an open question…
13If I did wrong in the cause of my man-servant, or my woman-servant, when they went to law with me;
In eighth through tenth grade I got myself together enough to make it to school on a semi-regular basis. I missed a lot more than most but had a very understanding doctor who wrote me a catch all excuse note while we figured out what the heck was going on with my health. Even in this confusing time the Lord blessed me with parents and a doctor who believed me. We muddled through.
On September 29, 2007, I jumped back into the fray and took Betsy Coffman’s second channeling class, now affectionately referred to as “C2.” For the most part, I still wasn’t really channeling when I worked on my own, and I didn’t feel very ready to go on to the C2 class. I decided to try it and go with whatever happened.
Hey friends, I will start this new post with the good news right away! I finally found a new job. I know it since Wednesday, but I guess I just needed the last two days to realize it's real! You remember I wrote about the interview last post? I made it! The recruitment procedure was kinda hard, that's why I'm specially glad to have gotten this job, I had to hand in appications, surviving a phone interview (partly in English) first (which I thought I totally failed) and then had the personal interview which went quite well, since right after the conversation my future boss told me that I passed everything! So starting May 29 I'm gonna work as a ground attendant at Düsseldorf Airport, doing check-ins, supporting boarding procedures, supervising passengers etc. I'm super excited and can't wait. I believe it will be much better and more exciting than my former job at the insurance company, hahahaha. I'm really glad jobhunting is over now and I can concentrate on other things, like how to spend the last remaining 3 weeks before my work life starts XD Any suggestions? ;)
But for starters, a good friend (should be a good listener) will do too…
Now, I don’t claim to be a great cook. In fact, I kind of suck at it, that is unless I have directions or a recipe. I’ve never been able to just throw things together. As I embark on this smoothie making time in my life, I have to try to use my imagination (and Google) to try new combinations of fruits. Take the mango for instance; I don’t particularly like mango. I don’t even enjoy their aroma. Yet I tried one in a smoothie and it was fabulous.
I read through the email a second time (it was pretty short) and noticed that it wasn’t addressed to me.
Lamb Dumplings, Served with a Mushroom Consommé
We catch a glimpse,
Either way i am in love with these and I've been struggling to decide which to wear as they are all so pretty.
“Yes, yes. Please open the gate, we must not dawdle here…they may be watching.” Regnans looked agitated.
Our Jim made fortunes by deceit,
Griffin, at least, said things were very clear.
I began to lose heart. I turned away from the object of My desire, feeling defeated. Brother Henry persisted in his attempt, determined to secure the prize no matter the cost. Meanwhile, Brother Oliver announced that he detected a foul stench in the air. I suspected that he smelled the sour odor of My disappointment.
So..here's the deal...another AWESOME sketch this week and if you play along with us one random winner gets a free set of stamps! Where is the bad in that? Make a card, link it up to the Skipping Stones post with the sketch, and you will have a chance to win! You don't have to have SSD stamps to play, either, so you just need to DO IT!!! Just say'n.
The haze.
5 Id., 74.
Growing up in Kansas I have a reverence for Boulevard Wheat that no one but people from the region seem to understand. Kansas summers are damn hot and the wheat ale is the perfect thirst quencher. You can drink it all afternoon and not be in a stuper. It is also a excellent gateway beer for your pals who have yet to discover the broad world of beer beyond macro lager.
through quite well, including Ian's always interesting banter.
but later,
I am a love – child of a Love – God, born of my Father’s love and with the capacity to love just like Him. I am tender- hearted, merciful and forgiving just like my Heavenly Father. I refuse to allow malice and bitterness take root in my heart because I have the capacity to overlook the faults and shortcomings of others to GOD glory in Jesus Christ Name I pray! Amen!
To be that pennant would be too fearful,
For Christians in particular, I recommend it if only because so many have a tenuous grasp of Christianity’s real history, as opposed the versions that too often are casually accepted as truth.
Now I love Stouts and Porters, I am Irish Guinness is still my favorite beer, and I hope a craft brewery, maybe one in Utah can come up with a beer that dethrones Guinness to me but it has not happened yet. So I know this style of beer and saw it at one of our new DABC stores, (The one in Holliday just off Highland Drive AWESOME BEER SELECTION!) so I grabbed it and the Galloway Porter that they offer as well (haven't tried this one yet, I am waiting for my disappointment to wear off.) and opened the Stout last night. The first thing I noticed was an alcohol smell off the head which surprised me since it is less than 6% ABV. Then after tasting it I realized that the flavors just didn't last and that the mouth feel of it was very thin almost watery. The flavors were not bad, and there were some very nice chocolate, and coffee noted in it but they just did not last. Those issues alone would not make me completely write this beer off but then came the kicker. The aftertaste....The alcohol notes carried over into the finish of the beer and killed the good flavors it has at the start. The other issue is that the competition in this style is stiff -Captain Bastards Oatmeal Stout from Squatters- and -Madame X Stout from Hoppers- are both amazing and a few seasonals we have available are very nice as well.
$35 - 9 entries
13 April
I did make the silverbeet pie! You might remember I had a couple of jars of whey after I made those camemberts. I decided not to make pastry but to make ricotta instead and to use the fresh ricotta in a crustless pie. It was delicious.
Also, I went to a seminar at Hancock Fabrics recently sponsored by Bernina. It was about the proper use of stabilizers, how to embroider on towels, baby items, etc.
Grandma: Feels like its been longer.
Ginger – ½ inch piece, finely chopped and crushed
Picked up a copy of The Corner of Arundel Lane and Charles Street from Jen Hamilton-Emery on Sunday, at the Northen Salt reading in Manchester. It was nice to meet Jen and some other Salt authors (Andrew Philip, Steven Waling and Elizabeth Baines, whose partner, John Ashbrook, was kind enough to give me a free copy of his 1980 collection In the Footsteps of the Opium Eater). I'm afraid I missed the reading, having come straight from a family lunch in Buxton.
Note: I've learned a few risotto tricks along the way. Make sure your broth is neither boiling hot (in which case the rice will cook too fast) nor too cold (in which case the rice won't become tender enough). Think Goldilocks, in terms of keeping a nice low simmer - just right. I also recommend using your largest skillet, and keeping the rice and broth evenly dispersed over the whole surface, so the rice can absorb the liquid to the maximum. Yes, you are stirring the whole time, but rather than making it a vigorous stir, think of a gentle agitation.
Now that you’ve listened to the mix, you’ll be wanting a copy. WEll it’s just your luck because you can download it HERE!
Skim the fat off the top of the sauce then return the contents to a boil. Reduce the heat and simmer, uncovered, for 8 minutes or until the sauce is reduced to 2 cups worth.
I have been thinking of buying new family room furniture for the past five years. During that time, I made numerous visits to the few local furniture stores we have, but never found anything I really loved. The Lazy-Boy furniture I had was still is very good condition, so I was in no hurry.
But should I do that? I mean, I have been put under fire by someone that does not matter to me, but I wonder if she isn’t just expressing some of the thoughts a lot of people around me are thinking, but do not say it aloud.
A few years ago, I visited the Li'l Bee's blog often and one day noticed a pretty button on her sidebar. It took a while before I had "enough time" to click on the "Nie" button and when I did it was because it was so pretty. I had seen references on other blogs, but as I was not familiar with NieNie's blog it rang no bell. What I found was the inspiring story of a young couple who survived a tragic airplane crash over Thanksgiving weekend. This story might have crossed your path as it was picked up in news and media all across North America. It is a story that reminds us of how very lucky those of us who do not live with daily struggles due to injury, illness etc. are. Sometimes we need a reminder.
and late yesterday evening
In 1952, the United States Attorney General told him that his re-entry to the U.S would be challenged on charges of turpitude and political unreliabilty. He had never actually attained American citizenship, in the first place, he'd actually refused it, so he destoyed all his American possesions and escaped to Europe.
The action comedy "Get Smart" sends CONTROL agent Maxwell Smart (Steve Carell) on his most dangerous and important mission: to thwart the latest plot for world domination by the evil crime syndicate known as KAOS.
Make sure you read this to the end; you will understand why I sent this to you.
the rambling story of my life,
ROM 1:13 Now I would not have you ignorant, brethren, that oftentimes I purposed to come unto you, (but was let hitherto,) that I might have some fruit among you also, even as among other Gentiles.
Andy's work had a dip contest today and he asked me to make something for him. So I made some more pretzel bites with beer cheese. And you know what?! It got 2nd place!
Oh yeah... I'm a slacker.
Benefits of hiring a France Schengen visa agent
I am coming to terms with having Diabetes, initially I was shocked and angry. I had been suffering with Shingles for months, and had been back to the surgery several times and just been given different painkillers, my weight had dropped by a stone and a half and I was so weak I could barely function, as I explained in a previous blog I was taking every high energy drink I could lay my hands on and pushed my glucose levels to a dangerous level, which resulted in me eventually being admitted into hospital and being diagnosed with Diabetes.
I’ve been back in the States for just over a month now, so between job hunting and trying to stay on top of all things HR-related, I’ve had some time to think about the transition from Asia back to the USA. While the big move has been smoother than I thought it would be, there have been a few unexpected challenges along the way.
And as always you must live well to be wll…to your personal wellness
I hope my snaps have made you smile and you will all have a great weekend. We will, cos its my darling hubby's birthday tomorrow and there will be special family times to share.
Everyone remarked about how good our insurance is. I don’t know if I was hearing correctly but it SOUNDED like our maximum out of pocket on IVF is 6 grand. I don’t know if that’s per cycle (3 maximum lifetime) or just the out of pocket max for all 3. Either way, 6 grand is worth it to have a baby. I certainly hope if it gets to IVF that 3 will do the trick, after that we’re on our own. I’m also scared that my egg quality is bad and I will need donor eggs. I would be absolutely crushed if it came to that. I don’t think it will, but it will always weigh on my mind.
I loved Gina.
Father we serve a mighty God we give praise honor and Glory to your Name. We ask today that our minds be fixed on you and that our spiritual nature will overrule our flesh. Father we die today that you would live through us to accomplish your will. In Jesus Name we pray and ask it.
and tim and I had never discussed school stuff before.
“. . . introverts relate to other people. Of course they do. They just do it in their own way.”
We’d love to hear from you, scriveners. Do you like to read posts from guests? Do you like to have guests on your own blog? Do you think visiting other blogs helps sell your books? Do you have any tips to add?
The Animus's true form was revealed, as resembling an octopus with some arachnid features. The Doctor, Ian, Barbara and Vicki helped the Menoptra to destroy the Animus using the Menoptra's secret weapon, the Isop-tope. After that, the travelers left the natives of Vortis to resolve their differences peacefully.
- In Macassar: Japanese residents posed as guides and interpreters in order to spy.
Addison hung up the phone and got off at the next bus stop. St. Martin’s was only a few blocks away and she could walk there. She scaled the stairs leading to the giant cathedral as quickly as she could.
Let’s get one thing straight first of all. Animals are stupid.
So why am I talking about the mundane subject of taking your rubbish to the tip? Thoughts about the link between the process of coaching and rubbish removal were inspired by a tweet today.
The only thing in this box that I am 100% unfamiliar with is the piper betel. I have no idea what it is nor what do use it for. The newsletter has some suggestions but we'll see what comes of that. The fennel has the top attached so it huge, though the bulb itself isn't. I don't know what I'm going to do with it but I hope I can use it all. There's not much I have planned for this stuff since I am going on vacation for a week on Tuesday and Matt will be home alone. I really doubt he'll be doing any cooking so I gotta figure out a way to make this stuff last until I get back. I still have some things from the previous box plus there will be the box next weekend. I guess we'll be eating a lot the week I get back!
I wish I could say I was immediately enlightened at that moment, that transcendent clarity filled my mind and compassionate forgiveness for my mother’s stupid choice to stay with my biological father for 23 years filled my soul. But it didn’t. It took time. It took a lot of time. But it was at that moment I began to see my mother through new eyes and I began to understand my responsibility in mending the brokenness between my mother and myself.
32 oz crushed tomatoes
The game was played twice, changing sides, and thankfully it was proven that even though the number of figures was not equal, the scenario was well balanced.
Tetsuya Ichimura (1 gelatin silver print, 1964)
cottony hiss of the humidifier
After Norm MacDonald, arguably the greatest Weekend Update anchor to grace the SNL new desk, was unceremoniously canned by NBC, he spent a few years making movies that range from underrated (Dirty Work) to terrible (Screwed) before being picked up by ABC for three seasons of his own sitcom, Norm. Even with a The Drew Carey Show at the peak of its run as a lead-in, Norm never drew all that much in terms of ratings, a hint that MacDonald’s sensibility was a touch more suited to late night with its inherent weirdness. After Norm we got half a season of the soul-draining A Minute With Stan Hooper, and since 2002 Norm has had little in the way of film and TV parts, only briefly gracing the airwaves for his sporadic but justly legendary appearances on Late Night (and the Tonight Show) with Conan O’Brien and to deliver five minutes of brilliant anti-comedy at the Comedy Central Roast of his Dirty Work director Bob Saget.
4. I focus better when I am drawing or making doodles. Also, I doodle on at least 90% of the papers I get.
I let Helen eat her dinner on the sofa and fed Mase in his crib. Papa cleaned peanuts. The rug had to be rolled up for beating on the roof the next day and the peanuts on the floor swept into airy pyramids that could be scooped into plastic bags. Somewhere towards the end the evening, after the children were down, but the clean up was by no means done, Grey walked into the kitchen, eyeing me. I offered him a glass of wine. He eyed me still, not believing I had the restraint. I poured him some wine, and when I passed him the glass, I stuck my tongue between my teeth and bit down ever so lightly.
3/4 cup butter
From my reading about missions work it's becoming increasingly obvious that to stop, look, listen and be open to learning from the people we are serving is about the best thing to do, so it looks like my 'temporary mute-button' and my work will go hand in hand - Yeah God!
That, then, is the bad news about our sin, and, as you can see, it is really, really bad. How do you respond? Will you deflect it onto other people whom you see to be sinners?...Or does this view of our sin cause you to want to fall on your knees before God in repentance and contrition over the sins you have tolerated in your life?
Write your thank-you note as soon as possible. You don’t want to begin your note with an apology.
Children are brought up with this mentality that even ONE person can make a change. They are taught that they each have the power to make the world a better place.
The rescued panties aside, everything that happens after Jake enters the mall was filmmaking at its finest. The beach/tunnel chase, the fact that the sequence was mostly dialogue-free, the bizarre make out session (complete with aggressive neck kissing), the sly smirk Jake sports every so often as he's following Mrs. Revelle, the close call with "The Indian" in the elevator (one that was filled to the brim with freshly scrubbed yuppies), they all came together to fashion one seriously gripping slab of suspense cinema.
But this hope is good only for the believer, the member of Christ’s body. For those who do not know the Lord as personal Saviour, it is a different picture. I am referring to the likes of 1 Thessalonians 4:13. “But I would not have you to be ignorant, brethren, concerning them which are asleep, that ye sorrow not even as others which have no hope.”
6. I've only been to one concert my entire life. The Anger Management tour featuring 50 Cent, Lil Jon, and Eminem. Didn't see that coming, did you? I hope to actually see somebody I like one day.
I feel like I am being underpaid and need some opinions. I work for a family in NYC. At around 5pm I pick up a 3 year old boy from his daycare. I then take him to the park for about 20 mins of playtime. After that we take the train about 10 mins to his home where I then microwave his dinner and feed it to him. After his dinner, I give him a bath and then clip his nails. His parents reach home about about 7:15 pm and then I leave. They pay me $20 per day and do not reimburse me for train fare to bring their child home and on some pay days they claim they forgot to go to the atm so I have to wait for the next day to be paid. One week they completely forgot to pay me. Please give me your opinion.
Eddy U — Associate Professor of Sociology
Often, I wish for more consistency rather than
This was published in yesterday's Belfast Newsletter.
It’s been a thorn in my side from the time I picked it up. I bought it at the SA about a month ago but didn’t have a truck at the time so they allowed me 3 days to pick it up. A friend agreed to come with a few days later. Of course in the mean time we had another snow storm!
As I know that it’s not just me, I wonder why a lot of really great women don’t let people know the real them? No, I’m not talking about the loud girl with the super high heels and too much makeup. I was that girl once too (at 19 instead of 29 though), and believe you me, at that point, even I didn’t know who I was. I remember talking a lot but not really saying much at all, and thinking that I needed to be tough talking to show that I was strong. I was so busy worrying about my weight and what people thought of me, I didn’t even think of what I thought of me. And I knew nothing of what life was going to throw my way at the time.
Essentially, what we’re looking at here with Institute of Medicine, its director, its funding sources and its laughably unscientific conclusions is an orgy of Big Pharma money and influence peddling masquerading as scientifically-grounded public health.
In high school, I hated going to the bathroom at school. One, I was scared I was going to miss something in class and hated asking people for notes (yes, this just goes to show you how much a nerd I was lol) and two, I just hated using public restrooms when in school. I would “hold it” for 6-7 hours a day. 5 DAYS A WEEK. That’s a lot of time for your bladder to be full. When I finally did use the restroom, it was awesome. Like ‘Oh my God, I just have to sit here for a minute and catch my breath’ awesome. How bad is that?
The rules require patients to give their consent and a review board must approve the procedure before using adult stem cells.
Reese
I was so proud of my good deed. I patted myself on the back for taking the time to help a little turtle.
adapted from Ten by Sheila Lukins
Gradually beat in:
Arquette
A New Historical Research Challenge
The painting is fleeting, and before I’ve seen even a glimpse, it closes and fades away. I am left with an even more vivid picture of my own inadequacy. And I remember the last part of the song… “Living is dying, Your mercy is how I believe… I’m down on my knees… confessing my needs again.”
I educate friends on jailbreaking and unlocking.
He parked in spot, if you didn’t know. Oh and when you get mail that says DO NOT BEND in big all caps, bolded letters…Yeah, just bend that envelope all out shape, it doesn’t matter.
All-around Blue
No sun to light the days.
Rubber (Dupieux)
And failed at a miracle
** looking at you here, frost mages
We can pretend we are in the wild, wild west, ready to shoot folks in the face and talk like a hillbilly and find that acceptable? Obviously to some people, yes.
The one shocking thought that crossed my mind after I thought about all the extra laundry, and getting home late every night was “Oh my gosh, I think working out is my hobby.”
Ashok Tuteja writes from Karachi
If I learned one thing, it would be to fall in love when you’re ready, not when you’re lonely. If you’re not happy with who you are on the inside, you won’t be happy in a long-term relationship with anyone else either. You have to create stability in your own life first before you can share it with someone else.
In other words, anything you do, must be unconditional. If you are ‘doing stuff’ to reduce karmic debt, it won’t work. In fact, it might even backfire and add to your karmic debt!!
Thankfully, they were newly restored after a hundred years of neglect and are now protected in perpetuity as grade one listed structures.
And this is where YOU come in: Say no to turtle eggs, turtle products and shells. Like with any product on the market the lower the demand the lower the need to supply. It angers me when I hear of turtle captures as their rate of survival even as adults are low as they are quite defenseless (no teeth to bite whoever grabs them). So, please, do what you can to help these beautiful creatures. Life is already fragile as it is for them.
Repeat on other side.
Catch that!
"What the hell?" Mike said. "OK, text Sherry Stanfa."
What makes a Hershey bar pure?
LOL! I like the way you think!
British Design 1948-2012 – V&A
The dark sea, and the waves that hit the red rocks,
Hello Gorgeous! is a book about women who battle cancer and a unique organization that serves them by restoring a sense of beauty and vitality in their life.
time does not exist
Brought up by the resident ghosts, ghouls and spectres, Bod has an eccentric childhood learning about life from the dead. But for Bod there is also the danger of the murderer still looking for him - after all, he is the last remaining member of the family.
James Murdoch is being questioned by the Leveson Media Enquiry this morning GMT, but Newscorp Director of Public Affairs Frederic Michel is also turning into a central figure, the main context being in relation to Michel’s uncomfortably cosy relationship with the oleaginous Culture Secretary Jeremy *unt.
When to use: A fortuitous officiating mistake makes everyone in the bar hate you. Use this quote as your apologia.
Mash it and add the breadcrumbs, egg, ginger, garlic, salt, cumin powder, chilly powder, crushed black pepper and mix well. You will need to adjust the quantity of bread crumbs used, based on how wet the batter is. The batter needs to be stiff enough to shape into round patties.
Here's the basic pattern of my days. Wake up to feed the Bug. Put her in her high chair with a bowl of Crunch Berries. She will eat the red and purple ones, but not the yellow ones, which must be inherent to childhood because I certainly didn't teach her that. Pressure her to eat more quickly so we can hurry to the basement where I can feed the baby, who is hungry by now. Turn on Disney Jr. to entertain the toddler, who will probably empty the toy bin all over the floor while I am tethered to the chair.
12. Kors clogs, $4.99
Just today an article was published in the USA Today travel section listing Canfest—an event that brings together microbreweries and large-scale corporations that produce canned beer—as one of the “Top 10 Reasons to Visit Reno.” Now in its fourth year, Canfest was originally conceived by The Abbi Agency as an event to help leverage their client Buckbean Brewery’s brand as a premium brewer of canned beer. How did Canfest grow to become such a notable event in just four years? Why is building an experience around your brand important?
Cliff Cresswell - vocals, Henry Hartman - guitar, Rick Cresswell - bass, Nick 'Taff' Williams - drums.
That stroke of luck or disaster is the time when our energy savings get liquidated. ES turns into Visible Result (VR), so the more we receive luck, our saving will also decrease. Thus, if we want to have lots of luck (or “unexpected help in the right time and right place”), we must do more good things in life!
I am one of those people who gets overwhelmed easily- and a house full of people to entertain seems scary just in thought. So, because Holly has never had a birthday party before, I decided to try a small (mostly family) gathering to test out my party-planning/entertaining skills.
Najib’s wife, Datin Seri Rosmah Mansor, launched the submarine which was named after Malaysia’s first prime minister, Tunku Abdul Rahman.
Spoon the batter into the prepared muffin pan. Bake for 25 minutes. Cool in the pan for 10 minutes, then remove to a wire rack.
Now I’m not suggesting that the Palestinian plight is unwarranted; indeed, Israel’s stance has, I believe, been unnecessarily forceful, at times unethical and even unlawful by rules that govern war. So while the Middle East crisis should not be totally absent from our conscience, the fact is that there is strife across the globe, most of which Pakistanis tend to ignore by comparison. There is, of course, conflict and/or strife in Myanmar, Yemen, Georgia and, most recently, Kyrgyzstan. There are, on top of that, crises across Sub-Saharan Africa and Haiti, besides Afghanistan and Iraq.
Nigerians must be surprised by the astonishing claims made by the Presidential aide on MDGs, as nothing is visible on ground to justify such claims. Her approach to the matter, and the wide claims, were completely off the mark. The ambivalence of Dr. Gbeneol on the issue of poverty reduction as it relates to the MDGs, clearly shows that such a policy, if at all it exists, is not well-thought through. It was therefore no surprise that she could not give specific details on the policy.
My guess was that he’d gone into the little wooded area behind the garage so that Poppy could have a run. He’d seen me let her off her lead there and was probably doing the same. But no. I walked around there, calling both Paul and Poppy, but they weren’t there.
6) Aviation
* You studied Art for several years, did you specialise in a particular field?
Here are a few things you can pray about specifically:
Why am I so interested in all things Gypsy? In 3 months time I will be travelling to Slovakia via the UK and Vienna. I will be joining a team which includes youth from Czech, members of a local Slovak church and Gypsy Christians. In cooperation with the local government we will be clearing an illegal dump and cleaning up other areas of the village. The project slogan is “I Love My City”. We believe that this initiative is an opportunity for the Roma, often seen as a curse in a community, to be seen as a blessing.
Among mothers of all ages, a majority — 59 percent in 2009 — are married when they have children. But the surge of births outside marriage among younger women — nearly two-thirds of children in the United States are born to mothers under 30 — is both a symbol of the transforming family and a hint of coming generational change.
7:10: Monkeyboy wants some milk. NOW. He also gets a diaper change.
Powdered sugar – 1 cup
Every tiny fear was put to rest as soon as I put the car in park in the driveway. E came bounding out of the house, looking exactly as I remembered and apparently not aging a day. We embraced, and all was right again. I went inside and gave big hugs to her brother, mother, and step-father, all of whom had big parts of my childhood and adolescence. It was as comfortable and as perfect as one could hope. E's husband had to work, unfortunately, but I can't wait to meet him.
The exhibition of 40 photographs and over 500 slides features images of life and work on the Dublin Docks from 1940 to 1990.
Your Divine Grace in fact exposes a type of guru exactly like the ones in ISKCON now. They are the ones who on their own initiative become spiritual masters i.e. self-made gurus.
Emboss heat gun
Remove to wire racks to cool.
The whole family got in on setting up the crib we already have. Kind of sad to see your babies helping set up the crib they used to sleep in. Know what I mean?
What's a sheriffs' department to do when everyone wants to attend an execution, but only two tickets are available? "What we always do," proclaims the hot pants-sporting Lt. Dangle. "Scavenger hunt!" And so it goes, as the officers track down such specific perps as a crackhead with a wig ("easy!"), and someone with a tattoo (bonus points if they are also Jewish). It's a cutthroat fight to the finish, because as redneck Deputy Junior enthuses, "Getting two tickets to an execution is like getting two tickets to NASCAR, except you know Jeff Gordon's gonna die!"
Tri-Colour Purple 5/10
The greatest person you are capable of being,
3 Luneburg Heath 4:53
2. Initiative update
Final note, a shout-out to my pals on Adena Trail, who requested that I read this book. Many thanks for steering me to it; I’m not sure I would otherwise have been willing to carry around for two weeks a book that is the size of a cinder block.
When he got home we had pasta and broccoli with lentils and cous cous and a fried egg (goes well together) to which Arlo added lots of ketchup. “Pasta and ketchup goes together very well” he said “and if you let me make my own pudding I’ve got another combination that goes together well and that’s your blog sorted”
Around the same time I came up with an idea for a different novel. It was a contemporary telling of the Prodigal Son story. The prologue captured my attention. I saw this young boy whose carelessness caused his mother's death and brought division between him and his brother. The prologue came clearly, but the rest of the novel was a muddle in my mind. The prologue even captured the attention of editors at Mt. Hermon writer's conference, but what good is a prologue without a complete novel to go with it? When I got the idea for what came to be my first novel From Dust and Ashes the prodigal son story got put on the shelf. Every now again I'd take that idea out and turned it over in my mind a few times, but I felt God's whisper, "Not yet."
So what do I have to show you today? Another House Mouse card coloured in with Derwent pencils and yep you guessed it more torn papers too lol I fear I may be getting a little bit predictable but I hope to have gotten round to making a card with one of my own digi's later on in the week so that should be something a little different.
5. Suggest ways in which they might improve their child's breastfeeding, sleep habits, toilet training, table manners, and overall behavior.Enjoy it because it will be the last time in your life you will have all the answers.
Of equilibrium.
The bottom line is that someone with access to that firearm used it to commit a murder! The murder suspect was either a policeman, or someone with close ties to the police. To make matters worse, the prime exhibit in the case was missing! The whole incident, together with all the red-tape involved, including the sloppy attitude displayed by police officials involved in the sordid affair, gave me many sleepless nights. And yes, you guessed it right! Nothing came of the incident, not even after I had reported the matter to the Independent Complaints Directorate (ICD).
Every jazz enthusiast is familiar with "Night in Tunisia" by Dizzy Gillespie. Well, here is some jazz you might actually hear some night in Tunisia.
E.g.:
This is the intersection of ethics and etiquette, and it can be a dangerous crossroads to negotiate, even when I’m not chasing down neighbors with my car. Most people want to adhere to a system of moral principles governing appropriate conduct, and at the same time don’t want to embarrass themselves by behaving foolishly. Etiquette — the rules and conventions governing correct or polite behavior in society — should also be proper. And I can tell you how to accomplish both.
I have been looking forward to Boulevard's Rye on Rye coming out since I first saw the barrels marked "Rye" in the barrel room at the brewery. As regular readers here know, I love rye beers and I really wish every brewery made one. Having the hometown brewery make a rye beer is just the sort of thing that makes me happy. Having the hometown brewery give me a bottle before they release it was reason enough to dust off the Lido Deck bar deep in the bowels of la manse du Vard and invite people over.
It was a REAL fight this time, Next had a bloody paw.
In the mirror’s reflection I could see his cute, tight smile stretch and part revealing by scintillating degrees his beamy white teeth lined up in that sweet young mouth of his like the most beautiful row of marble tombstones.
I scribble a few words
You can enter more than once. A winner will be chosen from the Random Drawing for week #11
After the government's clarification on the taxation of FII inflows through the Mauritius route , the markets bounced back handsomely and closed with robust gains. The Nifty crossed its psychologically important level of 5200.
Since I love paper so much and have been on a search for cute file folders for the past 7 years....I had just picked up some new cute ones at Michael's, 4 for $1 dollar and 3 for 1$ at Target Dollar Spot. I've been thinking about a command center for a little while. I have a couple of projects in process for this in our household, so you will have to get by with just a few pictures of what I completed tonight. I'll post more when I finish the rest of the project. So, I went around my house and gathered everything that I thought could work for a command center like what Toni at abowlfulloflemons.blogspot.com made. Here were my options:
I’m having one of those back to work after a long weekend brain freeze things today, I have to admit. Isn’t it funny how just one extra day away from work can put you off the notion of working entirely? Maybe it’s a sign of a long weekend well spent, which is by way of saying happy (belated) May Day holiday to all of you, my lovelies! La Bealtaine shona daoibh!
How about a short A-Z challenge?
The movies at the top of my queue currently ( I count series disks as one place on the list):
The Dahlia is San Francisco’s official flower. Enjoy them this month as they are in bloom across the city. I picked these up at my local market. They are from one of my neighbor’s garden—I wonder who?
We'd had a fun day, laughing and visiting, and now we were getting ready to drive back to our hotel.
“They’re criminals, so they have a cunning way of approaching you. They study you all day.”
(For reading 1001 times)
One of the most traumatic events in my life was the death of my grandfather. I was only five at the time of his passing, but it was a blow to my spirit and although I didn’t grasp the finality of it as a boy of five, it was life changing.
Eric Freeman does some great things with his eyes throughout. Ricky finally loses his shit completely when he finds out that his girlfriend isn't a virgin. It culminates with an Internet meme in which Ricky shoots a man taking taking out his garbage. In a series of increasingly brilliant murders, Ricky kills a guy who looks like Fred from Scooby Doo and strangles his girlfriend with a car aerial.
new layers emerging, obscuring
DJ Set, Miami Nightclub, Inverness 28.04.2012 =
Re-reading this post, it sounds like my day was pretty boring, but I did enjoy it a great deal; maybe that’s the mark of comfort. I know Delhi is busy, and I can see the millions of people swarming from place to place, but it just doesn’t feel that way. This might be a function of me being more comfortable with India or Delhi just being a wonderful place to live, but either way I am glad I get another day here to experience it some more.
On the Republican side, in his NRA speech Friday, Mitt Romney said, “I happen to believe that all moms are working moms.” (The right-wing radio personality Laura Schlesinger always said, by way of introduction, “I am my kids’ mom,” as the most salient piece of her identity.) On the other side, both Hilary Rosen and President Obama used mom as the toughest-job-in-the-world’s title.
So, prior to the coming stresses, we packed the kids off to watch Puss in Boots at the local multiplex today and - once they were out of view with their pound shop sweets - bought a 'how-fucking-much' size portion of popcorn and snuck in to watch The Iron Lady.
One amazing thing about San Francisco is that it has more non-profits than any other city in the nation. It has people who care. Who dream. I wanted to be like the people in San Francisco. I wanted to dream, to do things that mattered.
I ran out of film before we had lunch at a great restaurant in the new OIOI in Nakano, where i managed to order a meat free meal in Japanese. It didn't sound good, i'm sure, but it's progress nonetheless!
you wailed. When you say such things
So after taking the airport express trough the centre of town escorted by our excellent translator Yang, we arrived at the airport and said our almost tearful goodbyes to Yang and in return got invited to her English wedding in July!
Last, you don't have to wait for me after events, I can just call. During Karate, Art, Knitting, and play dates you always have to wait for me outside, instead you could be getting a massage, having coffee with friends, or having a romantic dinner with each other. After I am done I can call you to pick me up. You can do many things when I have a phone.
What up…
(N) Nurturing – Bandaged his wounds. Stopped the bleeding.
Now on to some fabby inspiration from the Design Team!
In ancient Rome, marriage was called matrimonium – a specific reference to the fact that wedlock in that culture was a way in which a woman reached a higher status (that of being a ‘mother’) within society. In ancient China, marriage was also primarily concerned with procreation – though the Chinese concentrated on the marriage of opposites, too. Not only was marriage was it the marrying together of a man and a woman, but also the joining together of different families - people with the same surnames were not normally allowed to marry in Imperial China.
Start hitting gym again, at least 4x/week. Went to gym 5 times a week or so. Will keep it up and incorporate more weight training classes.
Throughout life we generally try to continue the cycle, we try to grow and progress in different ways, either by getting married and having kids, or following and achieving your dreams and goals to get to that dream position in our lives; whatever it is, we’re always trying to progress and grow to be better individuals.
The secret is consistency: “I have learned to live independent of my circumstances…” (Greek) ”independent of external circumstances.”
Together, the women built for themselves a life of selfless courage, order and mutual support. Grey is the Colour of Hope is as much their story as Irinas. With faithful attention to detail and surprising moments of humour, Irina Ratushinskayas continuously gripping narrative culminates in her unexpected release. It came as the result of intense pressure from the Western media, political and church sources, and the petitions of countless individuals who were deeply moved by the poets courageous struggle.
In her second race, a 6f MSW on 08/20/2011, she finished first by one length, defeating second place finisher Broadway’s Alibi, an eventual G2W who has started to garner quite a bit of buzz.
A series of beads represents the size of tumor each method of detection can find. The smallest bead is the size a thermogram can detect. From there, the size an MRI, ultrasound, mammogram, clinical exam and finally a self exam (the largest) can detect. Her hopes the beads will help raise awareness and money for research to end breast cancer.
A Pynchon time saves
10. Wow, your mum/sister/Aunt Mabel is really hot.
And if the male gender of the species really is unable to control these urges, for God's sake let's either medicate them or stop making a big fuss and just accept the nature of the beast!!
The run had a lot of rolling hills through downtown Nashville. The views were pretty stunning and it was nice to run with a friend. We just talked and joked around while I continued to monitor the pace. I have a pretty bad problem of starting too early so I wanted to make sure I started slow so I could finish strong. The race weaved around the Vanderbilt campus, and through neighborhoods with plenty of college students out enjoying their morning. Many people at this stage of the race were enjoying Mimosas and various morning cocktails. It appeared everyone was enjoying themselves and this helped the mood of the runners.
Last night I thought of all the things I actually wanted to do, for a job, in my life. I am thinking this because the head at Emory tells me that the reason I didn't get in was because of my undergraduate grades (now 12-15 years ago). So thinking of my experiences besides classes, my life experiences, what I was doing, dreaming, when everyone was going for interviews. I had an interview, too, a copy editing position at the Village Voice, I had a roommate in New York, who I had met during my internship, she designed costumes at Juillard, but then I had to go ahead and have a complete nervous breakdown. And I've never moved to New York, it never happened, I've been trying to for years, it's become my Moscow.
In other news, a very hot, but stupid David got himself tangled up in Regina’s web when she tricked him into having dinner with her. As I warned in my recap last week, David is in serious danger of becoming a dull, and unsympathetic character, and this dinner only added to this danger. The two bonded, and David thanked her for ‘being there for him’ during these difficult times. (This statement left me at a loss–just how has Regina been there for him?
Roman writes:
Pin bright, copper-gold in colour, with a slightly wild note to the nose - I don't think it's infected, but it might be the aroma of a load of hops ageing disgracefully. Busy carbonation, quite dry, slightly dirty orange squash and toffee finish. Maybe a hint of beeswax? Aftertaste has a suggestion of Orval about it - again, I think it might be hop-related rather than anything else. This has been knocking around for a couple of years, in pretty good cellar conditions, and what has emerged is deep, slightly sherried, and enjoyably complex.
The last time they spoke was in October at a private Melbourne club when Mr Kroger insists Mr Costello asked him to help get a safe seat for a return to federal politics.
After my rebirth of duress in Christ, I remained a Christian throughout my teen years though never so earnest and terrified a one as I was that first summer. I returned to camp at least one more time and saw a few more Rapture films before my indoctrination was complete. I eventually joined the United Church and became part of a singing teen ministry. I went to Breakfast Club before Church each Sunday and eventually the social aspects of Christianity won out over all that fear-mongering. At the time, I believed I was a true person of faith but in retrospect I know that my core was hollow on this count.
I got a notice that the first book available from my list is Ann Patchett's State of Wonder! I've been excited about this one since before it was published, but I've been dragging bootay on actually reading it. This is one I'd love to purchase since I hate dragging around bulky hardbacks, but as my wallet is currently squished under the load of books I'd like to buy, I'll be sticking with the library's copy and hoping I don't develop carpal tunnel from holding it. Also, I have an employee with a VERY similar name to Ann Patchett. Kinda weird!
Which would you choose. Write the new book or continue the series?
Tues - Restaurant Style Pork Salads. Included are fresh tortillas, black beans, flavored rice, cheese, flavored pork, romaine lettuce, pico, and crunchy tortilla strips and of course spicy ranch.
I hope to share the teapots adventures until May 5th as we hit the road on
The comedian grave digger prays his routine can sustain
You will note from my writing that I seek to address the wider issues impacting on Nationalists in Britain, South Africa, America and elsewhere in the world, and I have sought to remain scrupulously neutral with regard to the various divisions which have occurred within British Nationalism in recent months.
simple simple simple drawn on - FACE
"No potatoes for me".
This summer I wished I was that little kid again. We know very few people with pools and those we do know live further than next door and no one has a pool from the 1950's. On really hot days this year I would find myself daydreaming or half remembering the joy of being able to play in a pool of cool water: having my Mom rate my dives off the diving board, Marco Polo, swimming through weighted hoops and diving for coins. I remembered what it was like 'going under' that first time of the day, the rush I would get from the cold water enveloping my skin and quickly reducing the surface temperature of my body. Then I'd pop up and the water would stream down my hair, chlorine stinging my eyes a little not just from the chemical but also from the sun reflecting off the water.
Back to the subject at hand -- this baby.
I thought that it had to be Jake. He must have forgotten the housekeys.
Manish Arora has mysteriously ended his thus far successful tenure at Paco Rabanne it was revealed today. The label had become relevant trend wise as well as gaining attention thanks to Lady Gaga wearing some pieces at the MTV awards in 2011.'Revisiting the Paco Rabanne fashion was a very enriching experience and an exceptional artistic and human adventure. I am, today, happy to have accomplished the mission I was trusted with in order to cast this iconic brand back into the spotlight', Arora told WWD.
Back to the present then. Last night I sat outside for an hour as the night faded. Joining me was the resident collared dove who is becoming more sociable. There is a nest in the conifer just outside the garden, hopefully then there will be a family of dove-ttes in the garden soon.
Ink: Baja Breeze (marker), Soft Suede (ink pad) and Soft Suede(marker)
10 - Red Sovine & Webb Pierce - Why Baby Why - 2:33
Sometimes it can feel like more than what the body can handle and yet when you allow yourselves to relax into the Divine Field, it becomes much easier to navigate those vastly wider dimensions.
The combination of hops and alcohol provided a very powerful antibacterial environment, but there was still much that could go wrong.
In physics 101, we learned that it's centripetal force. Center seeking. That's the force that matters.
Lunch: 30-25g carbohydrates
Well then there you have it …. what exactly have we learned from this little clip ….. quite frankly not a whole hell of a lot. For the love of Cain does anyone really have any interest in this whatsoever?? Ooooh Russell is coming back … yes anyone with half a brain figured that out at the end of Season 4 ….. and just in case you didn’t ALL the hints so far have led up to BURIED things coming up so doesn’t take a real genius to figure that one out. Alcide wants to play hero (YAWN) …. he would be more interested running around as a pet wolf if you ask me!! …… the only redeeming factor here is that Lafayette is his old spunky self throwing in even more curse words than I can manage in a typical sentence and summing up the fact that he is all done with the supernatural weirdness. Sorry LaLa …. unless you plan on moving far far away that supernatural weirdness will be around to stay because let face it none of us would watch otherwise.
Pizza (smoked mozz' wit' or wit'out pepperoni)
I'm still under the weather, and on top of that, I'm getting ready for both a writer's conference and my daughter's birthday--the one happening the day after I get back from the other. Which is a long-winded way of letting you know that this is going to be a rerun of an old post. But it's a post I need to revisit for myself because the writing (or the lack of it) is getting to me. I can't get to the computer for more than a few minutes at a time, and in those minutes, I wonder if I am spending my time productively.
This one was the real shocker.
I honestly used to think single people were pathetic losers. For the first time in my life I’m excited to be one. I want to be completely fulfilled with myself and my life before I let someone else in.
hiding in Mosques and behind women and children.
We think this is in response to all the people who complained about the iPad advertisement on the side of the Conciergerie. I think they're telling everyone to quit bitching -- Apple ads on the sides of historical buildings are the wave of the future and everyone needs to get on board.
Favorite color...purple, but pink if we are talking about clothes : )
Bronze Agenda Earn 2 stars
“Got it,” he says.
Photocopies in your possession of all articles and interviews of and by plaintiff Julian Robertson, as published by newspapers, financial business journals, etc., as well as copies of all speeches, lectures, seminars given by plaintiff.
Can't wait to see what you have all been up to.
about it. The idea is that trees can have multiple sizes and even shape of leaves depending on where they are on the tree. The sun leaves are, for example, on the tops of the trees where they gain the most sunlight. They wind up being much skinnier than their lower siblings called the shade leaves, which are fatter to collect any sunlight escaping through the top of the canopy.
1/2 cup unsalted butter
“He was so anxious, he couldn’t stand to sit next to you and hear you breathe,” DeBow remembers. A talented filmmaker, Ryan turned the lens on himself to record heartbreaking video of his own sleeplessness, his own irrational behavior — even his own mock suicide.
Yes, it is beautiful liturgy. In theory it should foster a more general orthodoxy and orthopraxis.
I did not see The Artist. One day, I will (I think it will be released soon in DVD here, so...), but not now. We had another big success in France, I saw one (Intouchables), not the other (Polisse), and you know what, because of all the reviews and enthusiasm of the public, well, I did not enjoyed the movie that much. I mean, I liked it, the actors were amazing in it, but that's all.... I felt the exact same way with Lost In Translation. Everybody was saying "it's amazing, it's amazing", so I was thinking about something really really big, and nope.
“Not all those who wander are lost.”
Admittedly, it’s not like they’ve got a wealth of opportunities to draw from.
Signing up for a Twitter account is free and it’s really easy to do. I’ve twittered from my computer and blackberry. The hardest part is writing a post that is less than 140 characters.
Usually, I get up once a night to go to the bathroom. This is definitely a pregnancy thing. I never woke up FOR ANYTHING before the baby.
He walks on the water out to the ball and hits it within a foot of the hole
Believing in starred giftedness has side effects, of course, one of them being that it involves believing in starred un-giftedness. We’re born geniuses or morons, and that’s about all there is to it. As far as language learning is concerned,
Generally, the original version is… a lot more serious. Okay, maybe “a lot” but you get the idea. It flows better and this time around things make a lot more sense. I mean, it has been years since I last saw this season so it may be that instead.
I guess I'm just being reminded of how fragile the balance is. How easily things can happen or be overlooked and how much even a seemingly small decision can change outcomes.
with one of Nigeria’s biggest
BALIK PULAU: The man who had allegedly mistreated his four Shandong workers at his reflexology centre in Bayan Baru has been released on bail.
12 hard boiled eggs, peeled
Changing into my jammies, sipping a hot cuppa while curled up on the couch with my blankie and bears.
But I ache to know
Pinning has become really popular. I resisted. It was one more thing that would take up time in my day that I really didn't have time to do. You know it would take the place of something else that I should be doing.
Å nåes av kjærlighet
Gerhard Jenne works on a test section of a pixellated portrait of the Queen made out of cakes, at Konditor and Cook in London. The finished portrait made up of 3,120 cakes, one for each week of her reign, will be displayed in Battersea Park on June 3, 2012, at the Diamond Jubilee festival.Picture: Dominic Lipinski/PA
I am so, so happy to have finished this quilt. I made the quilt top back in January this year and then had a major brain freeze when it came to working out how to quilt it. After my sewing mojo issues last week I needed a finish to perk myself up a bit - so I picked up my High Seas quilt and did some sketching to work out how I was going to quilt it.
The brackets indicate what I had to edit since the statements were found to be too leading toward a Mexican American Studies perspective. In plainer terms, they are illegal and out of compliance. A quote from a great literary figure, Luis Valdez, is now illegal, and a fact about education in our nation’s history is also illegal.
Tonight, having been ousted from my room by a Care Bear Movie infatuated four-year-old and booted off the computer by a boy infatuated twelve-year-old, I decided to indulge in a little guilty pleasure: House Hunters International. Don’t judge. At least I don’t yell at the TV like my mom does when the idiots pick the wrong house. Besides, it could be worse… last night it was Real Housewives of Beverly Hills. Oy vey! Anywho… I’m minding my own business and out of nowhere – BAM! – exactly how low we as Americans have stooped slaps me in the face. Vanilla Ice has his own show. No, wait. Vanilla Ice has his own home improvement show. Bob Villa just turned over in his grave.
For the conditioner I was also extremely happy since it was able to massage in my hair very well, and within a few minutes I was ready to rinse it did come out of my hair very well. I loved how this helped me get a comb through my hair with the tangles this I did love the most. I also loved how smooth is made my hair along with UV protection. Another thing it really helped with my summer frizz.
I went with soft colors for the bun and fun hot colors for the base!
This has really snuck up on me this month, I feel like I've lost the beginning of May somewhere! :)
We try to make their living a little more pleasant, and hope that, while the babies are with us, their parents will get the jobs, earn the income, and find the housing they so desperately need, so that “our babies” will grow up in stable homes, rather than sleeping in shelters, in the back seats of cars, or on relatives’ floors.
There are certain desired qualities in the wife of a pastor. No doubt. There are even certain responsibilities which come with being the wife of a pastor. But since when did a spouse automatically assume the same role as the other spouse? Is Michelle Obama the Co-Commander-in-Chief? Does the husband of the Public School Superintendent also take on that role or title? Does he assume the same responsibilities and authority as his wife?
Hello bloggers! The challenges are coming fast and furious at the Circle Blog and I have another entry. The prize for this one is a Yudu CardShop Machine!
This in turn suggests that the ‘master-morality’ and the ‘slave-morality’ are also only in conflict against the background of their basic agreement. Nietzsche is often very good at exhibiting the way that Christian morality – Christian asceticism, humility, patience, kindness, is in fact the exact mirror-image of the aggressive violence that it claims to oppose – best captured in Aquinas’ quote that in heaven, the blessed will increase their bliss by watching the damned suffer in hell.
The horn dominates the layout. Some serious carpentry has gone into ensuring that the musicians are at the right height from the floor, and in the right place, for optimum balance of sound. Perhaps the producer would have run sound checks, listening through the horn (which appears to lead through a wood panel into an adjacent room) to get the right balance of sound. Three violins; two stand on little platforms and one on the floor, a little further from the horn. The fourth person at the middle of the central group and closest to the horn is probably the singer, although he could be holding, but not playing, a flute. Dominating the image, on the right, is Roberto Firpo at the piano, his left arm a strong diagonal into the central group of musicians. He's the leader, but I assume he's higher than the other musicians because the sound balance requires it, the back of the piano to the horn. Two bandoneons, perched on chairs with little footstools, complete the orquesta. The layout is neat and well-organised.
I'm an introvert and don't like crowds, I show up opening day to festivals so my agoraphobic tendencies don't get the best of me, and I could only stand about an hour of this fest, even at opening, people crammed into the front parking lot showing all to well the desperate need for a full on fall beer festival between OBF and the Holiday Ale Festival.
As for our wonderful trip to see Grammie (or Mimi as Logan calls her), we couldn't have had a better visit. It was so special to have peaceful and relaxing moments together. Not much planned... nothing expected.... just time together. I loved watching Logan and Grammie together and I know it meant so much to both of them to really connect amidst the quiet. By the end of the weekend, Logan was coming to find her saying "Mimi, are you??". Melted my heart.
The nations raged, the kingdoms were moved;
Rhetorical Analysis: Other than doing what was required of project three on the LinkedIn profile, the other additional sections that I decided to add was a summary section, a wordpress application and the link to my Twitter. The reason I chose to add a summary to my profile is to offer a little background informatin about myself and to showcase my skills to write about other people (since my summary is written in third person). I chose to provide a link to my Twitter account so that an employer could see how I use Twitter to connect with my audience as well as so that they could get a glimpse of what content and imformation i shared to my network. I decided to add the WordPress application so that anyone viewing my profile could preview my writing skills and abilities by being able to see my WordPress.com posts.
Giving roses to our love ones are very common but still is a must for it symbolizes our feelings, affections, and love.
Elisabeth Sladen may no longer be with us, but her presence will always be felt. May she rest in peace, travelling the stars with her Doctor, Jon Pertwee and the Brigadier, Nicholas Courtney for all eternity.
Former Spurs reserve team coach Tony Hudson signed Paul in July, but after a poor start to the season the manager got the push in October. In came Justin Edinburgh on 4 October with Paul, along with many others, being made the scapegoats.
the sector; instead it is quite the
Def: to make the most of yourself
“It was January 1996.”
I have no one to blame but myself. I went to the quicky mart on Friday on my lunch hour. I said, "A pack of Camel Reds Lights, please." And, after the kids were asleep, I slipped out onto the back porch and lit up.
Obadob flobadob
Welcome to Monster Monday with Tabonga, here at The Dungeon!.. Our panoramic feature was filmed in the caves of Cacahuamilpa in Mexico and is an above average production for the time.
Except that I am counting on tomorrow being so much better.
But now it’s hard to find a processor that doesn’t have at least two cores. Essentially it means you have two processors on one chip, if you’ll accept the simple answer.
It's pretty fun...
--Candles! Because when we make fish for dinner, that smell stays. But we cover it with pumpkin spice.
that fastball
It made me realize another thing- I'm me. If people don't accept that, fine. I don't need them. I am myself, and there is no one out there like me. Same goes for the person reading this. Here's the quote on my facebook timeline cover-
Pam’s sexy face
And then I discovered that our measuring cup size varies too, here it is is 250ml, in the US it is 236.59ml and the UK it is: 284.1. Why are they all different?
Nokia and RIM both made operating losses in their mobile phone divisions in the most recent quarter, a signal of problems adapting to the rapid changes in the market.
As Group Capt. Lionel Mandrake, Sellers sends up British propriety and comments on the strained behind-the-scenes alliance of the U.S. and the U.K. in the face of a common enemy. As President Merkin Muffley, he is the epitome of the stifled, emotionally deadened American, a man whose ineptitude becomes both situation comedy and horrifying cultural commentary. And finally, as Strangelove himself, Sellers unabashedly displays his comedy chops as a crippled ex-Nazi desperately fighting to suppress his sheer ecstasy as the world collapses into chaos.
For e-tutorials that you purchase you can either order an e-tutorial or e-pictorial that is sent to you as an email attachment or you can "instantly download" an e-tutorial or e-pictorial yourself.
LW, Derry sounds like a really crappy place to live.
6. A friend came to the island and gave me some CDs with children songs and audio plays in Swiss. Songs and plays I remember from my own childhood. Since ‘Timan’ is singing the whole day, I’m sure he’ll like them and will pick up some songs in no time.
I started a business …Lazy Larry Woodworks… a few months later…
The St. Louis chapter of the Council on American-Islamic Relations (CAIR-St. Louis) today thanked county and law enforcement officials for agreeing to provide religious accommodation for Muslim women who wear an Islamic headscarf, or “hijab,” and are held in the St. Louis County Jail in Clayton, Mo.
These eleven, being ambitious to become big acaryas, started initiating disciples on their own. The result of the imitation of Your Divine Grace is the sad history of ISKCON over years. The self made gurus, trapped in the clutches of illusion about themselves, have kicked and destroyed all the valuable (pots) assets of ISKCON and rendered it bankrupt both spiritually and materially. The disaster forced thousands to leave ISKCON, thus rendering the movement bereft of their valuable services.
and if you don’t like it you can eat poop, (juvenile but it rhymes).
robot appears to be barely functioning -- much like Duke, and
5. Knead the dough lightly and cut it in half. Shape it into loaves and place into two well oiled loaf pans. Cover both with sprayed plastic wrap. Put one loaf in the freezer (more on this loaf later). Cover the other loaf with a towel and allow to rise for 30 minutes.
I make pictures from my daughter and chose one.
Yeah, so I just want to put this out there so that 40 years from now, when people are trying to define and codify and write lots of vague, boring stuff about the films that exemplify (-fied) the millennial transition we’re even now struggling through, I’ll get credit for coining the genre term they overuse. How serious am I about all of this? Nowhere near as serious as a heart attack. We’ll call the genre “screwball existentialism” and include willfully strange, almost-slapstick, highly original movies that deal intensely with the nature of being, memory, and identity. Here are the big ones:
The only notebooks I could pick up were these copybooks for Thai schoolkids, who are clearly into cryptic idioms and psychedelia. I have piles of these back in Ireland. I used to dream of becoming a famous writer, and, after I shuffled off this mortal coil, some intrepid scholar digging through my “papers” and discovering these. That still makes me chuckle.
Send your resume to: itpilipinas@gmail.com or oliver.santos@dencomphil.com
And no, we haven't spent our whole time having coffee (although it is one way to escape the rain!) We had a good visit to the aquarium and a good workout at the Cliffhanger climbing gym.
We currently tax American jobs in two ways. Taxing your job only once would actually increase tax revenues over time by increasing the total number of American jobs and increasing wages, and thus income tax revenues.
He noticed the problem quickly enough, though, and lifted his good arm towards Rel for a hand up. Rel eyed it dubiously. "You're sure?"
Have faith.
But we paid too great a cost,
aglow in peach and folds
FACTOID: The filmmakers built a railway bridge over the Osam River in Bulgaria for the film; the bridge remained after filming and is now part of the Bulgarian railroad network.
The exclamation point neither makes a character louder or angrier. That’s the job of language, both in the narrative (She yelled till her voice cracked.) and dialogue (“You lousy SOB, of course I found out you were cheating on me.”)
If you are running out of time and need something quick or you have family members asking you for last minute ideas on what you want, hopefully you live in a town with a Sephora. Every girl loves things that smell pretty and Philosophy is a champion at making things smell scrumptious. They have these exclusive scented bodywash/bubble bath sets at Sephora right now that are named for It's the Most Wonderful Time of the Year, my favorite Christmas song of all time. (White Christmas comes in a very close 2nd.) The packaging is also very retro festive. If you have enough time, you may be able still get it shipped expedited if you don't have a Sephora close to you.
Um, I think we should all stop paying taxes now.
Whats this blog going to be about?
You can check out any time you like
So here I am, asking for directions. It's shameful that I can't even muster the energy to make a case against JC. I know that my lack of interest is founded on ignorance and prejudice. I'm sure that a man who dominated Europe, crushed Republicanism in Rome, and slept with Cleopatra ought to be fascinating. I'm ready to be converted. If there's a Caesar fan out there, please tell me what I have been missing, and point me in the direction of the book or website that will light my fire.
Personal Taste
X Ales were, even comparatively, strong beers. Unlike IPA, which was, if anything, below average strength.
A new rota system would begin in May which will make the system more flexible, and he guaranteed that all border control desks would be fully manned during the London Olympic Games, which start on 27 July.
"Coolth, Professor?", once again, he'd lost us.
Min 11: Or they fell dead from laughter and as they came crashing down on to the keyboard, the cursor was precariously resting over the unfollow button, their body weight accidentally pressed it, and now their souls will never rest as they scream out from hell, “NOOOOOO, I LOVED SWEET MOTHER UNTIL THE VERY END.”
Three summers ago, when we planted the new border and the rose/herb beds, it rained and rained. High summer is not, typically, the best time to put in new plants, but the weather conspired with my impatience. Only the lavender, which hates being water-logged, really suffered.
It is the police procedural that has network executives scratching their heads this season: The Case of the Disappearing Viewers.
Samantha Dunn: Author of Failing Paris (Toby Press), a finalist for the PEN Center Fiction Award and Not By Accident: Reconstructing a Careless Life (Henry Holt & Co.), a BookSense 76 pick & Faith in Carlos Gomez: A Memoir of Salsa, Sex and Salvation (Henry Holt & Co.). Dunn’s essays have appeared in numerous national publications including the Los Angeles Times, O (Oprah) Magazine, Ms., and Shape.
She said that the TV version of Barack Obama sounded really interesting and that she'd like to meet him sometime.
Did I mention that we were under the ground?
~ His spoken vocabulary at the time consisted of:
The most popular marker in the Copic line. Perfect for scrapbooking, professional illustration, fashion design, manga, and craft projects. Photocopy safe and guaranteed color consistency. The Super Brush nib acts like a paintbrush both in feel and color application. For more control, use the Medium Broad nib on the opposite end, or customize the marker with an optional nib. Compatible with the Copic Airbrush System. Markers are refillable… Read More >>
Between 2005 and 2010 average weekly alcohol consumption decreased from 14.3 units to 11.5 units per adult. Among men average alcohol consumption decreased from 19.9 units to 15.9 units a week and for women from 9.4 units to 7.6 units a week.
But do I look downtrodden to you? Pfhht!
Despite the rain we had all day, Mr. Vittles and I went to a cookout at my dad & stepmom's house tonight.
That's the short list of my resolutions. Of course I always want to grow closer to God and read his word, but again that is a goal I try to meet daily. I already consider it a life time goal and not just a new year resolution.
United struggled to find counter-attacking opportunities due to the nature of City’s narrow and congested midfield unit, leading Ferguson to introduce Danny Welbeck just before the hour mark.
At the weekend, it's time to chill out and mooch around the shops! Sogo is a Japanese department store in the heart of Causeway Bay and I've grown up walking around this place with my parents whenever we visit! One of my favourite places is the food hall (always) and I admired the chocolates at Lucullus and of course we bought a few. Unfortunately they're cute but not quite as tasty as they looked! On Saturday we have our weekly dim sum which is a bit of a change from the usual Sundays back at home in the UK. After our dim sum we wandered around City Plaza at Taikoo Shing. There is a great Muji there and I spent a little while looking at all the snacks on display. Forget stationary and homeware, in HK (or Asia in general) it's ALL about the food, all packaged in the easily recognisable Muji style.
1/2 c. confectioners' sugar
“glory, majesty, dominion, and authority”
So when the police get matters so far out of proportion, we are entitled to ask: Who polices the police?
"Thanks again thanks Mike, Jennifer & Alan!"
Looks like the cold weather early in April wasn’t kind to the peach and plum blossoms, so it will probably be a limited crop for them this year, if anything. The asian pears, apples and cherry trees are flowering nicely right now. Two of the apples Arkansas Black and Evereste have lots of nice flowers. Four of the asian pears (Chojuro, Ichiban, Hosui and Shinko) have between 6 and a 100+ blossoms each. Not bad for being only a year in the ground. We’ll see how many they try and set. Asian pears tend to try and over-bear. I’ll probably prune off the fruit down to no more than a dozen for each tree. The NY518 yellow cherry is the big winner for flowering this year, followed by Vandalay and then Stella. The Surefire cherry may not flower this year, but it is just getting started breaking dormancy. Surefire is really late in the season to flower compared to most cherries.
A family vacation can have such a sense of urgency. You don't go away often, so when you do, you want to get a lot of bang for your bucks. And you run yourself and your family into the ground trying to do and see ev.er.y.thing. Don't do that. Don't be Clark Griswold. If you've never been to where you're going, do your homework. Find out the must-sees and must-dos. Ask your friends if they know anything about your destination. Chances are, they do, and they can give you invaluable tips.
I am the author of “The Artist’s Guide to Success in the Music Business”, a book to help independent artists, musicians, bands, labels and managers achieve self sufficient and sustainable success in the music industry.
There you will show me
In my opinion, the understanding of democracy as a form of governance as a mere electoral exercise is shallow.
Never, ever start a sentence with “we need to talk…”. My most dreaded phrase. The terror!
But Riva did not ask to look at it, she simply nodded and said again, “I see.”
I forgot to tell u that yesterday I finished filling my application for the Japanese scholarship I’m so happy yet anxious I wish to be able to get and study there it would be amazing ^_^
“I know you’re not the sort to lose your head even over a man who looks like sin walking, which his lordship does”…”It’s your heart I’m worried about” (152)
I hope she leaves him before she kills him off. Why? Because I love the show “Mad Men” and I don’t think it would survive the demise of Don Draper.
Beg The Lord For The Grace Of Conversion For Our Loved Ones And The World
3) Getting to sign my books at a BIG book signing!
Even as slaves, Africans contributed by literally building the new nation.
But the 2 1/2-page Ethics Committee report doesn't focus on Green's "personal" privacy, dealing instead with his official actions - legal and illegal - in office, those who read the report say.
A chaotic political landscape may emerge, without clear direction, and a new Prime Minister may not be known for some time.
how do you shoot a baby with balloons?….. one way would be to give the baby space with all the balloons around her…. but how about shooting only the baby’s expressions with the balloons around her?….. you have to shoot pretty close, isn’t it?…. thats how it all began for Lamisa…. one of Lamisa’s favourite stuff is balloon…. she always demands balloons from the family members when they came back home from outside…. that made us create sort of a balloon stock in the house…. and however transient their lives may be, they still are capable of cheering her up…. and thats all that matters….
6) All classes are held in massive lecture halls with tiered seating.
Every hair, wrinkle and bead of water in these images has been drawn by hand, mainly with a pencil, in a pain-staking process which takes up to six weeks to produce a single picture.Simply incredible detail. I can barely manage a stick figure and this guy does NYC.
I am trying to decide on good music so any suggestions are appreciated.
Sirius, in the constellation Canis Major (the Greater Dog), looks extraordinarily bright in Earth’s sky because it’s only 8.6 light-years away. Many stars on the sky’s dome are intrinsically more luminous than Sirius but appear fainter because they lie farther away.
How is disability portrayed differently in American society?
* It is often assumed that Bobbie managed to retire a wealthy woman after she divorced Harrah, receiving a $3.5 million settlement. Accusations of gold-digging are derailed by the fact she made over $3,000,000 in royalties from Capitol alone. Bobbie also made millions from her Vegas stints which lasted on and off until 1980, and an alleged $4,000,000 when Warner Brothers optioned Ode To Billie Joe.
How many of us see what we see and believe it to be the truth?
HOGAN H. Flu vaccinations: are they worth the cost? Occup Health 1993; 45: 21-22.
“I did not want my tombstone to read, ‘She kept a really clean house.’ I think I’d like them to remember me by saying, ‘She opened government to everyone!'"
Planning a cheap DIY beach wedding is not that easy. Suggestions are very welcome! Especially involving ways to save money on food!
…an app is ok if it’s just misleading rather than blatantly dishonest. Though you’d think that an app called Lock My Screen that doesn’t actually lock your screen is definitely less than honest. But Apple has evidently passed it, and the author has apparently made over $1000 from it.
I grew up hard and I grew up mean roaming from town to town. I got beaten, I lost that child I was at a long time ago, I killed him as he was slowing me down. No room for the weak, no time for the memories. I push forth and carry the weight of my dead families hearts, the revenge makes the load heavy, but driven. I am here, I am going to destroy the world you have created. I am here, the black plague to reap the souls of the ones you hold closest to your heart. You children will come up missing only to be found pieces at a time, your love will be stripped of her dignity and treated as you treated my mother. I will take everything you have and the sweet taste of triumph only makes my anger water for your blood. I want to see you on your knees begging your God for forgiveness, I want to see the loss in your eyes, the sacred man trembling in front of the boy who was created into a monster, by your own works.
According to News Limited, Mr Kroger revealed that former Treasurer Peter Costello thinks Tony Abbott is an “economic illiterate”, doesn’t have a good word for John Howard, and remains critical of former colleague Alexander Downer.
Please see the customer reviews & ratings of Elinchrom BXRi To Go Kit with 2 500 Ws Monolights, Softboxes, Stands & Carry Bag. EL20751KIT Multivoltage 20751kit – Bundle – with Elinchrom Reflector 16 cm 90° & Adorama 40″ White Interior Umbrella at the merchant’s site by click on the link below.
Because his parents weren’t in Paris.
Anon – The Dead Man Of Varley Grange
The past had wronged her for sure, but she was still more attached to it than the present. And she didn’t even know the reason for it. The discussions in her head were not leading to any conclusion. The frustration in her grew when she realized that she was being nothing but masochistic.
A wasp nest
I have a drink almost everyday. It keeps me sane ladies! I am super weird about taking medicine (don't even like to take Tylenol) so I have never been a pill popper but wine sure helps me relax after a long day. I eat less and workout so I can afford the calories from alcohol. 5-7 is the longest part of the day for me trying to get Sterling fed, cook our dinner, and bath him all before Matt gets home from work. So I usually pour a glass and start sipping at bath time. Sterling plays and I get some time to just zone out and relax! If I don't drink wine I have vodka with a splash of water and fresh lemon, but I usually save that drink for the weekend. It is a great low calorie drink option. I never drink mixed drinks mixed with sugary mixers. Like for instance I would never order a margarita at a restaurant I would just sip straight tequila instead (slowly). Too many calories plus the hangover is way worse from mixed drinks!
For years, in the back of my mind, I’ve been noodling about this positive thinking problem that Ehrenreich’s analysis leaves still unsolved—about how it shouldn’t work but research says that it does. Sometimes the problem comes to the front of my mind, as when my massage therapist is working on my shoulders of steel, telling me that I should be open and positive and believe that (for example) I don’t have to worry about money because I can have as much of it as I want if I just believe that I can, and keep affirming it. If only as a practical matter, I realize in such moments that it would be to my advantage if I could figure this thing out, because I’m paying her to work the knots out of my stiff neck, which is getting stiffer by the minute as I resist her line of thinking.
Comment #1108 - Jodi Frasier (confirmed)
2) Have a short story revising day where I get at least three stories into a form where I am ready to send them out for beta or submission. - I've got Thursday scheduled off work. Unless I have too many other things which I have to tackle on Thursday, this will be revising day. Can I get three stories done in that day? We'll see. It's a bit of an ambitious goal.
Toasted pine nuts (optional)
Crack In (his) Jaws (allegedly, I heard some guy in a bar say that)
To achieve their ends.
Easter vigil night.
Know what I want to do? Sit by a pool, all day, with a good book, my iPod, some hardcore sunscreen, and someone bringing me frosty beverages all day long. Then, at the end of the day, I want to have one of those hot stone massages, and be poured into a comfy hotel bed in a quiet room with light eliminating curtains. Then I want to sleep for at least 12 hours and eventually wake up to a gourmet meal from room service. And when I check out of this hotel/resort, I want the manager to say, "That's okay, Karla May. There'll be no charge for your stay. We just appreciate your business, and you looked like you could really use the rest. Please come back and see us again soon."
4 T Green Onions thin slided rounds
–With assistance from Elffie Chew and Manirajan Ramasamy in Kuala Lumpur. Editors: Young-Sam Cho, Suresh Seshadri, Barry Porter.
It’s the start of a great story when Emma runs into a boy at the beach. That’s Galen. Colliding one moment, two fates are inseparably welded together. Galen is temperamental, funny, witty and snarky, just like Emma. I’m sure that you’ll like these two together. They’re pretty entertaining with all their bickering,
Nothing really screams a good time like Jack Daniels. Although not a go-to whiskey of choice for me, their truly is a unique taste about good old Jack. This is a pretty neat little cocktail with a full on sweet and smoky flavor that would be easy to shoot and keep it coming.
I was working an afternoon shift, and the environment correspondent, Nick Schoon came up to talk to me. 'I've got a story for you,' he said, 'and it's a bit unusual. It's a crime story.' The story he outlined was terribly sad. A teenager, stabbed to death on a London street. Racist motivation suspected. It was the kind of story that I'd have thought of as suitable for a local rather than a national paper. It wasn't even that uncommon - as Nick's report stated, this was the second racist murder in the area in a matter of weeks.
Hondros also had consensual sex with her.
George Bush yesterday, the 9/11 memorials. You know, a friend of mine observed this. What did Obama do? Obama went to a soup kitchen, 9/11, a day of service, as though we’ve got something to apologize for, for what happened on 9/11. A friend of mine observes Obama and Bloomberg both acted like it was a natural disaster. Bush, George W. Bush, who, by the way, stands tall in retrospect. Ten years, not one attack… A little bit about 9/11 and the memorials that took place over the weekend. When you hear Americans reliving 9/11 — I mean real people that were citizens of the country; not media people or sports stars, but real people — You have to wonder: At some point will George W. Bush be on Mount Rushmore? Look at what this nation went through. The shock, the horror, the terror, the doubts, the confusion, the fears of what’s next, and out of that day — and out of that treachery and confusion we got the most implausible result: No more attacks. Quite a job, Mr. President Bush. Quite a job…
After sitting in the service center's waiting room with two bored dogs for over four hours, the customer service person informed us that although they were able to repair the transmission seepage that was coating the Autopark brake (and preventing it from holding), there was also a cable that needed to be replaced. Problem was that they would have to get the part from another dealership and it would be Monday before they could finish the work.
Row 18- sc in each, do not join.
Okie dokie, Robie was a character that had to grow on me. At first she seemed so frivolous and shallow that I thought I would dislike her, but after the plane went down and she began having to fight for her life, she changed. She grew up a whole lot during the course of the novel. In the end, she may have seemed weak to some, but you could pretty much assume that's because she was delirious. She went days without food and water. She was in the sun for hours on end. She had to witness some pretty terrible things. She was pretty much off her gourd by that time, you know? I have to say, I think she did damn well for a 15-year-old girl. I liked her a lot.
flippityflopitty said...
Add the soy creamer, mixing, until the batter is smooth and thick. Use as much creamer as you need to get the consistency of waffle batter. Let the batter rest while you heat the oil.
Do you have any advice for first time gardeners?
"We're going to trace your hands, cut them out, then glue them on the paper to make the wings!" the teacher explained.
Thank you for sharing another piece of your illustrated family. I had a wonderful time going through your created collection of “Oddments & Curiosities”. Also Thank you for being a long time reader and contributor to the Skull-A-Day project.
It is important to understand that Paul Krugman is a hardcore Keynesian. He believes that national governments can solve most economic problems simply by spending more money. His prescription for the U.S. economy in 2012 was summarized in a recent Rolling Stone article….
One purpose of this trip is to remind myself of what really matters. To refocus on what I believe is right for kids. To clarify and sharpen what matters. Today what matters are how students use their writing and reading notebooks and how Rief assesses, grades and gives students feedback.
I caught a glimpse of Millnet’s main working area when I was in the Scrutton Street offices last week; I suppose I ought to have guessed this from the frequency with which its name crops up around the market, but there were a lot of people at work in a space which was barely recognisable to anyone who remembers its first steps into eDisclosure. It looked rather smarter than I recall it – an often overlooked factor when trying to recruit and retain staff in a competitive market.
As he gets to the very core of his message, he presents some thought-provoking and off the beaten path ideas.
07. Sufficiently Suffonsified
19. Caffeine fights against your immune system and can turn it against you, causing auto-immune disease. This condition, known as immune dysregulation, is responsible for Lupus, Rheumatoid Arthritis and Muscular Dystrophy and Fibromyalgia.
Opening Reception – February 3, 2012 7-10 pm
Thankfully, it was an especially good year for Action-Comedy films. Why? Beverly Hills Cop came out. Rejoice, children, rejoice!
A simple report was all that was needed.
Big Idea’s primary intellectual property is VeggieTales, a faith-based animated series for younger children that retells Biblical tales using dancing, talking vegetables. Though it may sound bizarre on paper, VeggieTales’ charming appeal in addition to its early use of computer animation made it a hit throughout the mid-90′s. Over seven million Veggietales videotapes were sold in 1998 alone. The rapid growth of the company caused Big Idea to relocate to the Chicago area, where they undertook their first feature film, Jonah and the Whale.
Get free admission to over 100 participating Museums, Zoos, Science Centers, and Botanical Gardens across the US! Head HERE for all of the details and to find a participating museum near you!
MT: Often the ‘Nu Metal’ tag is slapped on aggressive Rock/Rap bands, do you put yourself in that category or do you see yourself as more experimental with your sound?
Anyway, if you haven't seen this short video yet, it is worth watching.
Raul Malo @ Cannery Ballroom I caught a recent show at Gruene Hall here in Texas and I tell you his new show is spectacular!
Another thing: I'm so easy to entertain. All I need is a piece of yarn. Today I cleaned the house with a piece of yarn tied onto my shoe so that I could watch my cat act the fool while I went about doing my thing. It added quite an element of fun. I wish that on my next job, I can go to work with a piece of yarn tied on my shoe and bring my cat along, it would make it so much more bearable. Maybe I can say that I need this as a job accommodation.
After that chance Arsenal looked to be in a good position to get the next goal and claim a battling win, but QPR struck from nowhere. Barton decided he didn’t have the bottle to go shoulder to shoulder with Song down the right wing and conned Mike Dean into awarding a free-kick and booking Song. The Arsenal defence spent the next couple minutes trying to clear its lines before Mackie got the ball down their right wing.
But the bottom line is (and we heard it all too often last week) that the odds are greater to be stuck by lightning than winning the lottery. Yet, we don’t think of that option that often, although, that too would be a real game changer.
As I've been a poor correspondent of late I'm going to try something a little bit different. Indulge me.
It’s a question I’ve been getting asked a bit of late in various quarters and the answer is invariably the same; “Yeah, busy. But it’s a good busy.”
I used two flourishes from Cindy Loo, a large border flourish on the front of the card and a smaller single flourish inside. I embellished the flourish with Close to My Heart's Bitty Buds.
And then he had the great good fortune of having the Republicans select one of the most inept candidates for the presidency since Bob Dole. And then John McCain did something crazy. He picked Sarah Palin, an unknown female governor from the very distant state of Alaska. It was a ticket that was reminiscent of 1984’s Walter Mondale and Geraldine Ferraro and they went down to defeat.
Midnight Band of Heathens @ 3rd & Lindsley * presented by the City of Austin
But Smeg, being the perv that he is, refused to stop there. Here is his second contribution, a Cannibal Corpse/My Little Pony mashup entitled "Cannibal Pony":
First we have my Beatnik, which I am really enjoying despite the fact that the cabling gets tiring after while. I'm finished with the back and a sleeve, and now working on the front and the other sleeve.
2000's Selon Matthieu (To Mathieu) is Breillat's most recent film that she's written but did not direct, and it's also her most recent film that's still not on DVD in English (excluding Une vieille maîtresse, which we trust is coming).
Last week a sign went up on the track entrances informing the public that the track would be closed for repairs from July 5th through August 12th. I honestly don't know what they're repairing but I'm hoping it's the lights!
Whatever you celebrate, I hope you will explore the riches within the spiritual context of the faith-based expressions that mark this season. Let us not fall prey to giving credence to those things that cause our experiences to appear less than they really are. Happy Hanukkah and Merry Christmas do not convey lack of tolerance; they express a history and faith in something bigger than what we can see in ourselves. And that is where the magic, the wonder and awe comes from during this season.
All Rights Reserved : Satya Sarada Kandula : All Rights for the Sourced Material Vest With the Source.
I'm about to collaborate on a digital photography unit with an 8th grade technology class. They have a local artist coming in to do some composition lessons and teach them some basics, and I am going to get them started blogging by helping them set up digital portfolios. I'm feeling pretty inspired to build up some new tricks and start bringing more diverse images into the blog myself, and am excited to learn alongside these students.
Early bird registration is $35 for the full weekend up until Sept. 26. After that, it's $50 which is still a bargain for the events planned and performances to be showcased.
My aunt JE greeted me and she was not acting annoying to my surprise, I told her that I was supposed to pick up something for my grandfather, and she said that it was some of his clothes that he needed dried in her dryer since his dryer was broken.
Questionable Content Team, Lulu.com
All they who serve are telling me
To get up close and personal with Taiwo's craftsmanship and talent she will be featured at the 2nd annual Collectively Eclectic Legacies Show February 13, 2009 at MacEwan Hall.
Divide batter between prepared pans. Bake at 350 degrees F for about 34 minutes, or until a toothpick inserted in the center comes out clean. Let layers cool on a wire rack for 15 minutes. Turn out cakes onto wire racks and cool completely.
“I decide what gets put on the agenda,” Faison said. “It’s unlikely that any bill with a moratorium in it has a chance of getting through the House.”
If you are pitching a romance, start with the two people involved in the romance, and what the barrier is to finding happiness. You don't need a lot of set up and backstory in a query (you don't need it in a novel either.)
Second issue is progressing. I am considering doing a subscription, but it would be issue based and not monthly. Where as I can promise you 4 or 6 issues, I can't promise they would be monthly. Two may come out the same month and there might be 6 or 8 week in between.
Over my life, Nanny and I built many special memories. I have tons of pictures but none of them are scanned in. However, if you can picture the perfect grandma, you'd have my Nanny. Just to clarify who Nanny was, she was my mother's grandmother...my great grandmother. To me, she was just Nanny. The woman who let me sleep with her in her full sized bed when I spent the night with her. She even made sure my pillow had my special pillow case on it. It was an old, vintage pillow case with ballerinas on it. It was lovely with fair dancers wearing soft pink tutus. She had a nightgown for me at her house that she made. As I grew, I guess she made new ones because I always had a nightgown at Nanny's house when I spent the night. Before bed, Nanny told me stories like Little Red Riding Hood and nursery rhymes like Little Boy Blue. LOL...I won a nursery rhyme contest at a baby shower once because of that!
The reason why I bring this up is that science can then be used to help us clarify theological and doctrinal tenets. I believe that God’s love has been misinterpreted lately by the faithful, because hope has replaced lawful process. For instance, even though God loves us all, we cannot assume (or hope) that a divine presence will affirm our self-importance, make us feel warm and cuddly, and somehow excuse us from the purification process. Rather, our spiritual transformation is more like a heated battle, where undesirable aspects of our character are removed only through a personal “trial by fire.”
Spellbinder decorative oval die
Mocknick: If you have any questions, don't hesitate to ask.
Mrs. Cameron opted for five-inch heels, guaranteeing she would not have to partake of any exercise and confined herself to talking and shaking hands. Very slim, she wore a hot pink over blouse cinched at the waist with a black belt and black pants.
When I joined Weight Watchers (WW) in January 2001, when my weight was much closer to 300 lbs. than it was to 200 lbs. and my blood pressure was 220/110, I started making big pots of this soup. It was my saving grace. I would get home late from work and stick one of those frozen diet dinners in the microwave. Those frozen diet dinners may have only had 300 or so calories but they were packed with sodium, fat, sugar, bad carbs and preservatives. This was before I educated myself about food and nutrition so all I was concerned about was calories (or WW points). That and the fact that those dinners contained about the same amount of food I'd normally pick on while I made dinner.
The Judeo/Christian theological principle that every human being is capable of good or evil and that each person, no matter what tribe, race or class he or she belongs to, is accountable to God for his or her sins is to be jettisoned. Classes deemed virtuous by reason of ethnicity are to prevail over guilty majorities. The result of the race industry may turn out to be a new royal order in America, a right to elevation above other races and classes because of bloodline.
03 - Things Have Changed
No, they cannot be dead!
Just when I think I am moving in a good direction with my life and my attitudes, I get this reminder that I am really just clay, water, and some divine breath. There are a few things that set me off in a really bad, fast, almost flashpoint-anger way. Being called out about things in front of other people is one of those things that sets me off, and there is nothing worse than my unrighteous anger. There is no dignity in responding with the same behavior that angers me to start with.
NASA's 2013 budget request is quite close to what Congress appropriated for 2012: it's down only .3%. So why does Planetary Science take such a big hit, dropping from $1.5 billion to $1.2 billion?
treated the assembled guests and dignitaries to a surprise keg of our
So, Mr PBBB, put that in your iPod and smoke it. And at our next party, I'm in charge of the music.
Among the items the Federal Government promised to spend money on were the construction of the East–West Road; construction of some roads and bridges in the six geo-political zones of the country; and the completion of rail routes.
You can try to talk or communicate with them, give them a deadline to move out from your home.
Now you know DHS has got to be godsend of to Federal level meddling. It brings the Federal government into all sorts local manipulations. But even for all that attractiveness, they cannot afford to maintain the programs. If the Federal Government cannot pay for them, it is certain that the States can't either.
Here's an old scratchboard piece of mine. Years back I was afraid of color. I did all black and white, all the time. Now? I couldn't imagine one of my pieces without color. They don't feel finished to me with out some splash of red (my favorite) or blue. This is a large Ampersand Art supply scratchboard. It is out there in a collection somewhere. I forget who bought it. If you look at my kickstarter project here, you can see a newer version in the video.
This is something Sam decided to do all on his own. I only got to read it just now and still haven't heard the audio.
Food photography has become a big component of blogging where recipes and techniques are shared and since I'm taking so many pictures to document my cookie making and decorating I've needed to find resources to help me improve.
15 The Wait
About Elysian Brewing Company
*Another deep sigh*
Interested in a FREE e-design service or perhaps a beautiful pillow? If I've got your attention, read on!
I do believe that the “whatayagonnado” is quite different than giving up, however, and I want to make it a point to say that. Giving up implies failure, it implies the negative connotation of admitting defeat. Those are passive actions. In my mind, the power of the “whatayagonnado” is about actively deciding to stop investing your energy into a particular issue. It means that you have the option to continue worrying, fighting, pursuing an issue, but you have decided to instead come to peace with the way the cards have been played.
So what’s a hope, and what’s an expectation? Is there a difference? Is there harm in having high expectations? Harm to me, harm to Rowenna? What is realistic? And does that even matter? If I have an expectation and Rowenna fails to meet it – am I at fault? Did I not work hard enough, or is it simply the result of Rowenna’s abilities? And if Rowenna is going to do things in Rowenna’s time, why do we push and push for skills and milestones? (These are just a sampling of the things running around in this head of mine lately – wish I had some answers!)
Perhaps it was curiosity, or the trained ear of a school teacher, but my sister glanced over to get a look at the two young men standing just a few feet away. She had heard the tone in the voice of the one doing the talking grow more agitated as the other turned and began walking away from him and toward the white tent and the Springfield Central Library. She continued to watch as the agitated one followed him.
Yep. Crock pot. I know that a lot of you see the 7 - 9 hours cooking time and freak right out. That is why you plan ahead and put it together in the morning and then you have a super yummy and impressive meal for dinner. This is a good thing.
It does feel as if Spring is arriving at the right time this year and after the last two Winters, I can really make no complaint about this one. So I'll start this little blog of odds and ends that didn't make it into a blog all on their own with a quick shot of the crocuses coming up in Kirkcudbright. I must have shown you this before - they do have a rather good display.
11.30am / 12:30pm / 1:30pm / 2:30pm / 3:30pm / 4:30pm
I remembered how much pain, heartache I endured that time. The lawsuit, group-break up, lost faith, everything happened made my fanlife even harder. I kept crying whenever I saw others’ touching words about how much they miss DBSK, whenever watching old clips…. And that time, not only me but all Cassies had the same difficult time.
…for them that honor me I will honor, and they that despise me shall be lightly esteemed.
Monday-Hang Power Cleans 3-3-3
So today I am grateful for big breaths, and for our amazing little Buddha Miss A. And having family nearby that can rescue us on days like today.
Thank you for visiting making wishes. xx
Essentially, I think my writing space needs space or at least a feeling of space, of not being hemmed in on all sides. A cosy cubby-hole just doesn’t do it for me.
Today, around half of Russians old enough to remember the coup believe that the events of August, 1991 marked the beginning of their country’s precipitous, inexorable decline. The greatest tragedy of the coup, it seems, is that so many Russians view it, and the Soviet Union’s collapse, as a tragedy.
2 tsp. lemon zest
But what would be more exciting if it was brighter. She closed her eyes again and concentrated harder on making the orb full of the arcane magic. Slowly but surely she felt it gorw in that little sphere. It even got bright enough where she could see the glow from behind her closed eyes.
Well, not everyone's lives are nice and perfect and tied with a bow. Not mine certainly! I'm all for setting goals and making plans to reach those goals. But when do you do when LIFE (not excuses), gets in the way of those plans?
I’ve stopped being shocked by the age and passion of the people at events like this, but I will never stop being thrilled. As a lapsed friend said after my ordination – “I never realised the Catholic Church was so young”. It really is so encouraging.
The Beamz Player allows ANYONE to be able to play music without ever first learning how to read a note of music!! It is like having a whole band at your fingertips....literally! The player is actually a device that hooks up to your computer via USB and after an easy install, it is ready to play in a matter of minutes. Simply strum your fingers over the laser beams and "play the light". What's your favorite instrument? You can probably play it and more on the Beamz Player as it offers hundreds of different instrument choices--allowing you to become the WHOLE band. The player comes preloaded with over 50 popular songs and if that isn't enough, other songs from a variety of genres can be downloaded (small fee applies) to your own library, expanding your selections and creating hours and hours of entertainment. A sample of the songs available for download include:
We’ll run wild oh
Although never explicitly addressed as such, this story is about gender and the restrictions and rejections which often result from rigidly following its dictates. Both the girl and her grandmother refuse to stay in what is defined as their space. Maori tradition is praised and revered in this book, but its gender restriction are challenged, or at least allowed to be transcended.
So, in order to help others prepare for the upcoming reenacting season and the ongoing first person interactions offered at the coffeehouse, here is a simple guide to turning your modern self, into your historic self.
which is a specialist adviser on Healthcare markets, Technology development, Business strategy & Venture financing, working with NHS trusts. Speaking in Parliament on 11 November 2010 during the Policy For Growth debate he said, "The third is the national health service. I know from my own experience that we are sitting on billions of pounds-worth of patient data. Let us think about how we can unlock the value of those data around the world." See
RELATED BLOGS
It hasn't been an easy childhood for Katie. She was only 3 when her father died in a car accident. Katie was in the car with him when it happened. She wasn't hurt, but she still remembers seeing him lying there, and she still has nightmares about it. It's one of the only memories she has of her father.
“Not that difficult to do at all – one day I’ll teach you to quilt,” was her simple reply, and the promise of learning to quilt joined the list of things I would do “when I had time,” a list that came to life only in retirement.
A few years ago the rotisserie oven broke. A couple of weeks prior to Thanksgiving my mom was giving the (now old) rotisserie oven a test run to make sure it was ready. Well, she found out that the mechanism that turned the fowl was not working properly. She asked my dad to take a look at it to see if he could fix it. She did not want to have to spend the money to buy a new oven. She left the oven on a table in the laundry room/back office so my dad could tinker with it.
He may have been less than straightforward with his IRA comrades; he may even have been duplicitous and furtive in his dealings with them, or
2 c water
Grease or spray a baking dish. Add the dough to the baking dish, flattening it and stretching it out to fit the dish. Cut the dough into 8 strips and then in half to make 16 thick ribs. (Note: if you want the ribs thin, this is enough dough to fill 2 baking sheets. If you want them thick, it is enough for one).
Sun 7-4
All about the Samsung Galaxy SIII will be out soon. Stay tuned with littlegeeko for more on Samsung’s new toy!
Item #: 11CPTW-SB1004
Born of Mexican immigrants in inner city Detroit, Rodriguez paints realities in monochromatics that state the "cold facts" as they appear to almost anyone growing up in urban poverty. I'm not saying this is a downer of a album. It's just not sugar coated and polished as a lot of other music. On the bright side, unbeknownst to him, when he called it quits and became a lowly day laborer, Rodriguez' music reached revolutionary anthemic status for the people of South Africa which then opened the door to his cult status bubbling all around the globe.
After freshening up we went back to the city and the National Geographic Museum where we toured the small free exhibit (we didn’t have time for the 2 larger, paid exhibits) before heading to lunch. On vacation we operate on European time thus “lunch” was actually 4pm, just in time for happy hour at Beacon Bar & Grill. Martini’s, mushroom quesadilla, falafel and sundried tomato flatbread, pretty good for a hotel bar!
And I do this while my husband’s out of town and I have strep.
When we got back Mark took the whole truck apart and finally found Ma and the babies- let us just say a quick hand with a vacuum cleaner took care of things.
Houda’s programme is not a groundbreaking progressive movement. It was sold as one, it was given all the shiny lights of one, but it was not one. This is how I personally feel, and judging from the (heated!) discussion that followed, I wasn’t alone. Labelling and selling it as progressive is dangerous and misleading, I would even go so far as to say.
April 20th is also Adolph Hitler's birthday and the 1999 Columbine massacre, but fostering a new tradition of celebrating the date as an annual Marijuana Appreciation Day celebration seems healthier than obsessing about those darker anniversaries.
Publisher: Corgi (Random House Childrens)
And if you think things might change once the effects of global warming actually start showing up in earnest... well, I have my doubts. Here is Revkin quoting social scientist Robert Brulle:I’m up in New Hampshire, and the signs of climate change are everywhere, should you choose to see them. The strawberry season has already passed (it usually comes in late July), and you can now get fresh blueberries (3 weeks ahead of normal). The lake I am staying at has lost a lot of water clarity due to an excessive amount of tannic acid. The lake had its earliest ice out this year in memory, and so the leaves had had a longer time to decompose, thus releasing more tannic acid to the water. The water looks more like what you see in the Pine Barrens than in New Hampshire. These changes are all just taken in stride. Climate change remains something abstract and far away, both in time and space. In short, these changes are being normalized.Cloudier lakes in New Hampshire today, an inundated Bangladesh tomorrow, and everything changing at the rate of one very slowly boiling frog. This is just a very difficult sort of calamity for our species to respond to.
I was first alerted to something being amiss by a desperately squawking Betsy. Mind you, Betsy often loudly complains if any of the other hens get too close, so I didn't run immediately. It took a moment for me to realise that I was hearing that squawk a little too well. Getting up from the sofa, I saw that the back door was open and the dog was outside. Oh buttocks.
ZAP
The month of September is always a toughy for me emotionally. Its the month of my Best friends Birthday and she went to heaven four years ago. She would have turned 20 this year. Its just crazy to me how much has happened since then. Its a very tough situation for me cause after she went to our heavenly father, my life altered completely. The gleeming sun and shining stars are a reminder to me that she is smiling down on her loved ones and looking after us. She left a little angel kiss on McGuire's neck for me to know she was watching over him in heaven for me. Usually that mark either goes away or turned brown like a birth mark.. but this one is still red, as if it were fresh! I love you Shelbie Rose McAffee and always will!
Michael Fassbender, wear hats.
oven to 350 F. Coat 13x9 inch dish( or 8 individual ramekins) with cooking spray.Whisk together eggs, milk and seasonings in large bowl. Fold in quinoa mixture and cheese. Stir very well and let some of the cheese melt. Transfer to prepared baking dish and if using Panko Crumbs or Bread crumbs add now and bake 30-35 mins, until bread crumbs are browned.
I think things are different now but it’s going to still be tough for any baby trannie undergoing transition. You start out as one thing and then one day you announce your intention to violate some serious cultural taboos. You’re as polite and unassuming about it as you can manage but somebody’s going to get offended. A lot of people in fact are going to get offended, just by the fact that you are claiming the right to do this. And you are going to engage in endless arguments. It’s a choice, no it’s not. It’s a lifestyle choice, no goddammit, it’s not. Trust me, it’s not. It’s against religion, it’s unnatural. I can’t help it if it’s against religion but if you’re going to agree with me that it’s not a choice then maybe you’ll go a step further and consider the possibility that I was just made this way. So if you’re of the notion that God made us all like a sculptor molds clay, then He made me this way. I don’t know why but do you expect to know the mind of God in everything? If God made me this way then I’m not unnatural and I’m not against religion.
Though most would call the story of Duchess Elizabeth tragic, I feel she made a difference with her outspoken cries for help and assistance, showing not only women of her time that women COULD have a voice, but illustrating even more to contemporary women that WE have a voice now.
A couple of months ago my oldest friend, a white Turkish Long-Hair named Chekhov, became ill and his treatment was not cheap.
This one's short & sweet, as we just got home yesterday, and I'm still unpacking and sorting out photos—photos we are lucky to have, mind you. I bought a new Nikon S8100 digital camera 2 weeks before the trip, and somewhere in the midst of Day 1 in Cancun, the thing completely putzed out on me. Would not focus, the zoom button had a mind of its own, and the camera would not shut off or on.
It's not too late to play along with this weeks challenge of "How Green Is Your Spring?". Show us your creative green Spring spirit, and link back to us. We shall return with a new challenge on Saturday, and tons of inspiration for you. Until then, happy crafting!
I can't think of the scientific name for this native heuchera, but it was quite small when I planted it, and I am pleased with its growth. I'm thinking the leaves were green in the summer.
Daughter: shrugs shoulders
H. P. Lovecraft was a voracious reader of supernatural and fantastic fiction, and he was continually on the hunt for powerful and stimulating works in these genres. Many of the stories he read directly influenced his own writings. This first volume of H. P. Lovecraft’s Favorite Horror Stories presents 16 stories that Lovecraft found to be of particular merit. Among them are the beautiful poetic fantasy “Idle Days on the Yann” by Lord Dunsany; Fiona Macleod’s grimly evocative “The Sin-Eater,” which influenced “The Rats in the Walls”; Arthur Machen’s grisly novelette “Novel of the White Powder,” which Lovecraft adapted for “Cool Air”; and M. P. Shiel’s “The House of Sounds,” which Lovecraft ranked among the greatest weird tales ever written. Also included are hard-to-find stories by Nathaniel Hawthorne, E. F. Benson, Théophile Gautier, John Buchan, and others, as well as two stories from the legendary pulp magazine Weird Tales (Seabury Quinn’s “The Phantom Farmhouse” and Arthur J. Burks’s “Bells of Oceana”). The volume contains an introduction by S. T. Joshi as well as notes on the individual stories, giving background on the authors as well as on Lovecraft’s appreciation of the tales and their possible influence on his work.
For those wondering I am still playing with scal, struggling with the design of a template at the mo. It's the cannabilised mermaid card on my other blog. File is pixel perfect and cuts well on my expressions but the score dots arent lining up with ends of the cut lines on someone elses cricut. If anyone fancies doing a test cut for me please just leave a comment with your email addy (I wont publish the comment) & I'll email the file over. Or you can email me at playingwithpaper@googlemail.com
He began losing his power over his men, and became desperate to prove himself. He led those still following him on another raid and massacre on September 27, 1864, in Centralia, Missouri. They raided and burned homes; found 23 unarmed Union soldiers and made them strip down, shooting all but one; they then sent a train on its way with zero people on it, so that it would eventually go out of control and crash.
After dinner, the tribe settled in for a long storytime and a big bowl of popcorn. One of the first books we read was Tomie de Paola’s The Knight and the Dragon. Mr. Man received the book for Easter, and when I bought it, I had assumed it was a retelling of the St. George and the dragon story; since Mr. Man’s given name is, in fact, George, it seemed like a fun and appropriate gift for the big guy. I was surprised to discover that it is a far gentler tale, and I’d encourage you to read the review linked above. At least half of the story is told solely through illustrations, and Bugaboo, Beanie, and even Mr. Man himself had a great time filling in the story in their own words. At the end of the story, Bugaboo asked me, “Mommy, why did the knight and the dragon want to fight each other?” I answered that they probably thought it was what they were supposed to do, since there are so many stories about knights fighting dragons, and even in the book, both parties found lots of books in their libraries about how to fight each other. She replied, “I’m glad they decided not to fight. I like that they opened a stand together instead.”
The next day after all is very dried and can be handled
It doesn’t improve choices at all. It actually decreases choice with respect to contraception, by weighting the choices heavily in favour of one choice. Of course, women can still “choose” to use other forms of contraception, but when one choice is free, and the others cost money, then a woman who is already poor (remember, this is available only to beneficiaries) may find that she can’t afford to make any other choices about controlling her fertility. If it’s a choice at all, it’s a Hobbesian choice.
The secret of fortune is joy in our hands. – Ralph Waldo Emerson
I’ve spoken to several local musicians and it’s true: the money’s in the safe bet, keep it mellow, encourage the two-step, sell those Bud Lights and margaritas.
-xo
Bake for 25 to 30 minutes in preheated oven; finished bars should spring back when lightly touched. Cool in the pan, and cut into squares.
:)* Fred
I must admit, I've been pretty crushed by the celebrity deaths this past week. Maurice Sendak, of course, was one of The Greats -- every childhood should be filled with his Wild Things, Pierre, and even his cunning little vixens. He was the greatest author I ever saw speak -- a curmudgeonly demeanor, yet amidst his "bahs" his words were so honest and even gentle, and he always seemed to be on the side of the children and respected them wholly. (No namby pamby coddling from him, no sir!) I loved him. Then Vidal Sassoon... I met him when he did a book signing at my old bookstore, and he was the kindest, most gracious and gentlemanly author that we ever hosted. I was in awe ("ohmigod, Vidal SASSOON!") and he told me I had beautiful hair. I don't, but that's a testament to how nice he was. His passing was a punch in the chest. Yet both of these men, while I'm sorry they're gone, they led lives so full and shared so much with the rest of us that I can't help but just be grateful they lived.
Hoofprints. The hiking path doubled as a horse trail, though none were to be seen at that moment. Still, one had trod by in the not-too distant past, probably on its way back to the horse farm on Bode Road that's surrounded by forest preserve territory.
I suggest you respectfully “sit-out” this year’s Thanksgiving week CCHD collection … and donate instead to a proven worthy cause that has not been the source of such extensive, long-term, and largely secret, scandal.
My next set of paintings was from a class where we had to not think about what we wanted as an end result and to use a limited amount of colours and use them in each square it was hard not to think out a process but i do like the outcome and i think i will add some stitches and i may put them into a quilt or frame them. What do you all think ??
If you scroll down to the "labels" section of this blog, it will become clear to you Who the center of my life is. It's the label with the most posts...
Copper prices reached a new high early last week, seemingly thumbing their noses at all the naysayers (including me). But they weakened in trading during the rest of the shortened week of trading. And today, they fell dramatically, down 3%.
My usual sugar recipe was 2 cups brown sugar, and 5 1/2 cups sugar. It had a creamy quality. This is my first try with the turbinado sugar. Still pretty good.
Let's Build It
The bigger picture can be scary. But it can also be encouraging, if you tilt it the right way.
TWO MORE BLOGGERS WRITE BOOKS:
I wanted to make a post full post of good-sounding quotes for a story that I’ve found and managed to actually write down over the past few years, but realized that half the list I recorded is on my laptop, and the other half on my PC. Guess that means I’ll just have something to blog about next week then!
I think of the beautiful green emerald jewelry
Congratulation to those who agree with this statement because you truly enjoy the beauty of this world. For those have not, please continue to read this article. Give us a chance to transform you so that you too be able to align your view into this direction.
Some of us learn to read quite easily, while others – more than you might think – have to overlearn every little thing to reach that magical mastery called automaticity. Automaticity: where there is no gap between the seeing/recognizing/processing/understanding/doing.
"Living is easy with eyes closed. Misunderstanding all you see."
Sunday I made my way back to the city and relaxed with a nap and a long run on the lake.
The rest of his blog is here. If you or anyone you know is into web design, specifically CSS, Eric’s a rock star in his field. He’s also endlessly hilarious-the above post is but an appetizer.
And maybe I’m wrong, but this Internet raging doesn’t just seem to be the purview of women, but of a certain kind of woman. A middle to upper middle class lady (usually white) who loves to tell other moms what to do. That’s not to say that some working class woman of color waiting tables at Denny’s doesn’t have the intelligence and sophistication to self-reflect, but she’s probably too worried about being sexually harassed by her boss or busy finding affordable health care for her family to navel-gaze about how she feeds, diapers, and comforts her kid.
But behind the scenes, a fierce competition is underway—a duel between two young magicians, Celia and Marco, who have been trained since childhood expressly for this purpose by their mercurial instructors. Unbeknownst to them, this is a game in which only one can be left standing, and the circus is but the stage for a remarkable battle of imagination and will. Despite themselves, however, Celia and Marco tumble headfirst into love—a deep, magical love that makes the lights flicker and the room grow warm whenever they so much as brush hands.
“ For I know the plans I have for you,” declares the LORD, “plans to prosper you and not to harm you, plans to give you hope and a future. Then you will call upon me and come and pray to me, and I will listen to you. You will seek me and find me when you seek me with all your heart. ”
There are no photos of the event because my camera has gone tragically missing. Just believe me when I say that if anyone can brighten an early, cold February morning, my band members can. SamTheDrummer came in with tales of wedding planning that would make your hair curl. Martha had just gotten done with a job interview and sounded very excited about the possibility (let's hope she doesn't get stabbed at this one). And Marti escaped from her grandson for just enough time to rosin up her bow and race through a new jig.
threatening to break through me
Today was a very special day. It’s Julie’s 25th birthday!!! We started our morning off in Custer, SD, in the heart of the Black Hills.
On March 17th, many smiling Irish eyes are turned toward Court Street and The Blarney Bash. For over a decade, this street party has been THE St. Patrick’s Day event! Located in front of Connolly’s Irish Pub, this shamrock soiree entertains with Irish step dancers, live music and, of course, great quantities of Guinness! The Pub itself invites you to sit back, partake in a pint and enjoy some great live music. Best of all, this is not only a guaranteed good time, but it’s also for a good cause – donations will be collected for area food pantries. Outdoor activities are open to all ages and music starts at 4PM (until 10PM) , but the pub is open only to over 21′s and a cover charge may apply.
at your own pace, turtle (fear not)
Hello! Janice here sharing a card with you that I made with the beautiful Daisies set. I was out of my comfort zone with this one. CAS cards are VERY hard for me but I hope you like it anyway!
Shabangu disagreed, complaining that his police-station only had twelve police-vehicles, that they were ‘understaffed and our main core function was crime prevention, something we have to focus on first.”
What I made for the challenge are a couple of Thank You gifts. I had ordered these bags from "Mish" and I knew I wanted to use them for the project but the problem is they were too big for what I needed so out came my sewing machine. Of course when the sewing machine comes out for a 10 minute project it becomes a 1 hour project because of AVA. The thread is pulled out when my back is turned, she is on the peddle with foot up, somehow she gets the spool of thread and it unwinds ....... seriously I should have a primetime sitcom. An hour later I have sewn up 10 of these smaller bags that are seen in the post today and I have the rest stashed away with the ones I got from Mish ...... her sewing is so straight. I hope the girls getting these gifts look at them with a head tilt because my sewing is always a bit off.
Finally, the map gives no indication that there's a missing "tooth" in the site plan on Block 1128, between Dean and Pacific Street, 100 feet east of Sixth Avenue. That's the width of five houses. Two of those houses have been demolished and the space will be used for a broadcast support area. Three houses remain privately owned, though they occupy land designed for a future project building. Everything east of that is not part of the project site.
What else?...I'll post pictures and describe.
She enters in the house. She looks around. Within the darkness covering the house there is a ray of light. Something is wrong, she knows it. The light; where the light comes from? She moves fast, her body shifts as a puma’s shade, she reaches closer to the light, and she feels the warmth of its beam.
Some of our fondest memories of our trip to Botswana in the summer of 2009 were the times we encountered the gentle South African Giraffe. I forget who in our Landcruiser spotted the chestnut-brown and buff fur through the trees of the African savanna on first morning at Stanley’s Camp.
and beautiful
Mugabe still retains all executive power almost a year after losing national elections, and this morning SADC leaders hailed the achievement as inspiring, reassuring and "kick-ass".
The discussion of racism and variations thereof raises some serious questions about balance which go well beyond Macpherson’s treatment of the Lawrences. He notes with some approval the contribution to the discussion of institutional racism in Stokely Carmichael’s Black Power: The Politics of Liberation in America (1967) and displays no sense of embarrassment at all in taking evidence from the MPS Black Police Association. Like Carmichael, this organisation is hardly an unbiased bystander and its own definition of institutional racism highlights some serious weaknesses for the practical application of the term:
We’re just sitting and relaxing on our patio. Actually, as I write this Heather is taking a snooze after swimming in the pool, a tasty lunch and a tropical and refreshing beverage. The breeze is a little stronger today, rustling the trees and palms vigorously. A few birds are chirping near by, and the sea is glimmering with silver light. We do feel like we’re at the edge of the earth, and it is a good feeling.
Here's "25 O'Clock," which was originally released on an EP with the same title on April Fool's Day, 1985. (Wink, wink.) Thank goodness this song exists, because I've already posted about Chicago's "25 or 6 to 4," and I can't think of any other songs with 25 in the title.
So many of us are wishing for that money train to come rolling along, that we have forgotten what the ride is really like. We have forgotten the ups and downs, the ends and outs and ah yes, the universe. The universe has to stick its nose in.
Ok, lemme get this straight, a little over 22 months ago the PM appointed her cabinet, most of them with Junior Ministers….and when these Ministers fly out the country, we still have to appoint replacements for them? Why? What’s the point of these Junior Ministers? Not to deputise? So, take Rambachan for instance, Dyer-Griffith can’t act/function for him, but John Sandy can? Well colour me confused…..you mean Junior Ministers just there to eat ah food too?
I got to level 46 in Vindictus this week. Vindictus takes more skill than KF.
“Fairy Godmother.” Hilda’s smile was beatific. “And you need to get to the royal ball.”
Joey Tribbiani's words kept ringing through my head, "You don't own a TV? What's all your furniture pointed at?" Well. At least we can now watch Fox and the Hound as Disney intended.
The film was the first production from Glendale Films, founded by Peter Newbrook, who had begun as the in-house director of photography at Compton-Cameo under Michael Klinger and Tony Tenser, then joined forces with Compton production executive Robert Hartford-Davis to form Titan. (This was before Klinger and Tenser themselves split, the latter to found Tigon.) Hartford-Davis and Newbrook would produce a number of horror films, including the excellent Corruption, before they too went their separate ways, the former to produce The Fiend under the incongruously grandiose banner World Arts Media, the latter to form Glendale.
And, if no other miserie, yet age?
Dear god its in my mouth!
Irene gave us some examples, then asked us to consider and – Write a poem about the feeling of loneliness. She suggested we look beyond the usual metaphors and get more personal in our understanding and expression of that sense of being we commonly call loneliness. If you still have some poetic breath following April, now please share this first May poem with us. And thank you Irene!
But it’s still a crappy act when we look at it in a bigger picture. I’m beginning to think that Lorenzo did this in order to add something to his portfolio. Why only now did he go for this? Oh yes, our hobby of “panggagaya” to be noticed.
Off to get dressed and sorted for this test, so see you all later and fingers crossed!
You hardly even dare to whisper it late at night when you're all alone..but imagine one day you woke up and the entire world knew about that dream..
You try to avoid her hold.
We get to the shoot at 11 a.m. See some of the clothes that eldest daughter and designer had between them rejected. Amongst them was a Hugo Boss coat retailing at 569 euros. She didn't like it apparently. Rest of team thought her a bit mad. She opted for one that cost around 40 euros on the High Street.
Taking an example from the world of business. Henry Ford first built an assembly line to produce cars. This was a revolutionary concept at the time. Yet, people now could not imagine putting things together without an assembly line. It is so much more effective in terms of staff, resources, and work flow. To me, best practices are something we all do (such as story times), and they determine what the best, most cost-effective, and patron friendly way of doing this program or service.
The cyclists were hard-core commuters and reaching their destinations was a prime driver. The bicycles were not your daily commuter bikes having weathered many years. Very few cyclists were women. Parents towing children was a rarity.
Paper: Solar White Classic Crest by Neenah
"In good times and in bad, he’s just the kind of partner that you want at your side," President Obama said as he toasted the Prime Minister, hailing his dignity and strength. "I trust him."
Grilled Octopus Served With Onion, Olive Oil,
Never mind "labour lieutenants" there isn't even a vacancy for "Labour Lance Corporals" to be filled from Congress House. Under its current General Secretary the TUC continues its tragic decline into irrelevance.
Their tandem silence startled Helene. After a few seconds, Mara pushed herself away from her drum kit.
And when the faces look like this - or Jean Dujardin's, for that matter - is it any wonder people thought they were gods?
Casey’s main attorneys are Jose Baez and veteran defense lawyer Cheney Mason. Jacksonville attorney Ann Finnell is working on penalty phase issues and attorney Dorothy Sims specializes in cross-examining medical experts.
“It’s me, Gary Boggs, from Smyth’s Olde Pub. I used to work there. I remember your band Boxer Ego. I heard you guys opened for Counting Crows then broke up. That sucks, man. What happened?”
Please check out my last blog post for some face and skin tips... I think you will like it!
"I repeat, the experience of the victorious dictatorship of the proletariat in Russia has clearly shown even to those who are unable to think, or who have not had occasion to ponder over this question, that absolute centralization and the strictest discipline of the proletariat constitute one of the fundamental conditions for victory over the bourgeoisie" (Lenin, 1952).
I commit myself to move myself slowly but with consistency never allowing the mind to hold me back within realization that time is short and no moment can be wasted – so I wake up every morning with the breath that brings me the realization that is another day where I have to make a difference and change myself, to make each day so that in the evening I would go to bed being calm knowing that this day was not wasted in trivial matters
Am I making sense? The King James Bible is perfectly designed to program our minds if we get to it without being influenced by the words and concepts of man rather than God himself
LC: Mostly because I love her. ;) Clarisse is an incredibly fun character to write, and it also made sense, given the events at the end of Mistwood, for her to show up in another country.
4. Now add the greens and keep mixing to blend everything together.Add 1/4 cup of water.
ac
I guess I'll stop rambling and mention today's treat
P.S Apparently 'cuppa' is an English expression too... so I haven't been listening enough!
Which reminds me: someone sent me a link last night to someone who is blatantly copying Kat O'Sullivan's sweater coats--even her photos are the same poses. I have no idea what this is about--Kat does sell her instructions because she knows people are going to make her coats--but here's what makes my stomach hurt: if you get an idea from someone else, even if they sold you the pattern and know you're going to make and sell it, you tell where the idea came from. Right? I mean, duh. You tell over and over and over--you make sure people know you're not trying to pass someone else's idea off as your own. People love these coats, and Kat can't keep up with the demand--hence the instructions--but you do NOT make them and pretend the idea came from your fabulous imagination. You say, "I got the idea from the fabulous coats created by Kat O'Sullivan, and I've tweaked the basic pattern she provided to add blahblahblah." You're still going to make the same money you would have made anyway, so you should be happy, since that seems to be the point of your endeavor, right? Making money. It will just keep you from looking like quite such a total sleaze by pretending you came up with an idea that wasn't, in fact, yours. Anyone who follows this kind of stuff knows where the idea came from and is wondering why you didn't say so yourself.
Now, I'm hanging out watching the Giants game (gross) and taking care of some stuff online. It's been a fantastic weekend! Next weekend, I have to work until 3 on Friday, Saturday and Sunday which is a huge bummer but I'm just as determined to make next weekend as great a weekend as the last two have been!
efforts of late General Aguiyi-Ironsi,
Last year it worked great for us.
U.S. Prisoner Re-Entry Council Talks Grants, “Myth Busters”
complete friendship, we know so fully
blockbuster. Crap there anyway. but it made me stay up too late because
All and all, this was a quick read–and despite having been written for younger minds, it is anything but easy. The plot is complex (though if you have read his Percy Jackson series, it’s not too unpredictable.) the characters are lovable and humorous and the research is well done. I was actually impressed with the amount of knowledge about the Egyptian mythology this novel must have taken to write. So many Gods, so many rules, and all jam-packed into one page-turning adventure.
Slipping through my endless song
This is the classic one. Right? I used some gorgeous patterned papers, a dry embossed frame, and a fabulous Bo Bunny Santa image for this card. I LOVE the way the Santa image came out! I'd like to enter this one into the Jingle Belles: Embossing challenge. :)
Of tree green valleys and mountains
My two favorite lines from the movie are: "Sometimes, I guess, there just aren't enough rocks." That one always knocks the wind out of me.
If history classes touched on the Holocaust, I do not remember it. What I do recall, as freshly as if it happened last month, was my introduction to the images of the concentration camps. The program, narrated by Edward R. Murrow, riveted me to the television screen.
Ezine editors/Webmasters: Please feel free to reprint this article in its entirety in your ezine or on your website. Please don’t change any of the content and please ensure that you include the above bio that shows my website URL. If you would like me to address any specific career topics in future articles, please let me know.
rescue my people from your power, so that they shall no longer be
When asked if he envisioned a future without pets, "If I had my personal
I have a big business meeting tomorrow I still need to prep for, so I'll try to keep this brief, which means bullet points :-)
Forgive me for a massive post, Gentle Reader, but I had so little time on the second half of my trip abroad (aka Gail's Grand Tour) that I did not have the opportunity to blog, or even make notes, that I feel I must get it all out at once so I am caught up on my own life.
which is rich not only in history and genealogy but also in some of the most
Low number one.
to them Primark is like pasar malam la, seolah olahnye the clothes in pasar malam tak leh pakai isit?
These are not good thoughts at a wedding. We spoke of codependency. One man said “I love them but I can not attend the wedding as my feelings about marriage are quite dark.” I agreed. I felt so dark. But I love them. And they are not dark. They are lightness.
And while standing out in the cemetery during a misty, drizzly Saturday morning, I took out my iPhone, searched for the final track of Bernstein and the New York Philharmonic's 1987 Deutsche Grammophon recording of Mahler's Resurrection Symphony on Spotify, and blasted its heaven-storming last five minutes out loud—no, not through headphones/earbuds, but holding my phone in the air, in front of Bernstein's tombstone, for all the world to see/hear. I, for one, didn't care how weird I looked doing it; I felt good doing it, dammit!
Em's dr's appointment took ALOT longer than I imagined so I didn't make it back to Noah's school for his Valentine's Day party :( I hope all the kids like the heart shaped crayons I made. They were fairly easy to make and would have been so much easier if I had a ton of broken crayons without the wrappers laying around the house. Oh well. Here's how to make them:
Busy-ness over the last few weeks means i haven’t had my zumba fix. So today being the first chance to do so, i hurried down to the local village hall and got gyrating. Glorious!
1 tbs taco seasoning
I do my best not to listen in, but the four of them all talk very loud.
Besides my growing obsession with Obama, I’m nursing an obsession with all the little things that make all the difference: the not-too-sweet honey in Poseidon’s baklava; the perfectly sweet apricot jam on Treat Truck’s jammy cookies; the authentic creaminess in Ronnybrook’s chocolate milk; the rich nuttiness in Van Leeuwen’s pistachio ice cream.
“Okay then.” I took her offered hand and stepped into the circle.
We talked about his works as we browsed through the library books.
Whether it blows, or rains, or shines,
I don’t get it. What’s wrong?
Make someone proud today, don’t give up!
What I find most interesting is that when you want to have a conversation on educational theory and practices, these chalk and talk teachers will not even admit this is the least effective way to teach – in reality, it is possible they do not know this point. I have been told education classes at the university level are generally hell and I am guessing this explains the overall low grades most education majors receive in their education classes – either that or the resistance to change is hell and the university professors are not able to convince their learners to step it up.
If I was a morning show TV producer, I would model my morning show after NPR’s “All Things Considered” this show is not too celebrity focused, but it has a levity. It gets straight into the news, much like CBS. But it takes time to hit on a variety of stories from politics to health to sports to economics.
I feel like I'm rambling a bit here (so what else is new?), but the bottom line is maybe once in awhile it pays to put the brakes on, attach the filter and think a little more before I dig my own heels in and make a decision or a judgement about something or someone with such brazen certainty.
I immediately knew that I wanted to use pink and yellow, because those seem to be her favorite colors (at least for hair color), and I chose glitter paper because of the sparkle in her outfit in the video.
"Four elderly gentleman, the entire membership of the Chowder Society, get together periodically to share ghost stories. These gents have been doing this for a long time there is a sinister reason why. We don't learn until well into the film what that reason is, and the leading up to it is the meat of the story. Set against a wonderfully atmospheric New England backdrop, it is revealed that the distinguished membership of the Chowder Society had accidentally murdered a young girl they were all smitten with 50 years earlier. The girl, brilliantly played by the enigmatic Alice Krige, has come back in the form of a ghost to exact terrible revenge."
If there’s anything unique about this episode, it’s that the last-act action sequence occurs at the beginning of the episode and not in the end. (So technically it’s not a last-act action sequence, but since it’s a standard component of the Avatar formula, it’ll keep its full name.) The kids fight their way into the Earth King’s palace, taking down probably hundreds of guards and Earthbenders. I’ll admit, I wasn’t very thrilled this time around like I was with certain other big action sequences (the ones in “Avatar Roku: Winter Solstice, Part Two” immediately come to mind), but it’s still a cool scene. I’d say it’s more or less like a harmless jam session where Aang, Katara, and Toph get to show off their wicked Bending abilities for its own sake. Not emotionally investing, but often amusing to witness.
This is the problem with this administration. Instead of doing its job the past 3 1/2 years, it has encouraged the taxpayers to do their job for them. “Call your elected officials” “Tweet your demands” “Do it now”. This is exactly with the president did during the weeks when the government was divided on balancing the federal budget. He told us to call our leaders. That was his solution. Is it not enough taxpayers- who he’s burdening with doing his job- are already financing this ridiculous nonsense? Apparently not. He ended his speech with, “And the time to act is right now, and I’m going to need your help getting that message out.” To hell with the message – how about getting back to Capital Hill and earn your salary?
Time meta-trageth time in the mirror of existence
Thursday we went to a small village somewhere far away in the hills. We saw a Romanesque bridge (I will post pictures later) and of course the entire town was picturesque. We passed a castle/family home of someone who came to the "New World" back in the 1600s, made a fortune, and returned to the Basque country and built a castle. Here, in the North, it is more common to see the courtyards surrounding the house rather than inside and surrounded by 4 walls which provide shade and cooler temperatures, because here, the weather is already cool most of the time. When it isn´t cold, that is. Like right now.
It was also the kick in the butt I needed to make some serious nutritional changes around here.
I wound the very long length, 100g, of fibre on my niddy noddy just as I do with woollen yarn, put 4 figure of eight ties in the skein, soaked and dyed it.
Then the eyes close, calmly close, and I speed forth to the darkness,
Taking Flight by Sheena Wilkinson. I can almost guarantee that anyone who likes my books will enjoy Taking Flight, which I have raved about ever since it came out in 2010. Even more reason to get your hands on it and read it now, because there will be a sequel Grounded coming out next year. In Taking Flight Sheena mixes urban grittiness with classic pony book, with a Northern Ireland setting and creates an exciting book where you care for each and every character, while competely recognising their many flaws. I've been lucky enough to read Grounded, and it's even better. Add to the travails of our hero Declan, the horse-mad boy from the wrong part of town, a neurotic horse called Folly and a mixed-up kid called Cian. There are truly shocking moments and I was enthralled throughout...and could hardly believe it had ended when it dod. More, please!
“What’re you doing there? “ he asked her.
After an interminable period of silence, a creative in his early thirties slowly gets to his feet.
Winner : Pete Brown - Man Walks Into a Pub - laughing out load on holiday in Spain can be quite embarrassing.
